
It seemed like a bright idea. Let's take a tube-map and store it in the genes of some harmless bacteria for massproduction. Which then escaped- but hey who cares? Then there was the Iranwar- Quran citation virus- created to force "conversion" by restructuring the  speech centers with endless recitations. That one burned itself out, but before it went, both of them had some long-term survivable offspring. Resulting in the subway plan syndrome or SPS. If you have that- do not try to call for help yourself, though you may think you are making sense, nobody else can make sense of that gibberish about the railways of long gone cities. Wait till they call an ambulance or organize a doctor for you. Help is on the way! It's in Earls Court, driving towards South-Kensington as you sing..

Invest in the Hyper HypeConcatenator Investment Fund™ — where cold quantum-entangled neural-mesh fusion meets post-synthetic cognition, zero-latency blockchain orchestration, and self-optimizing hyperautomation pipelines. Our proprietary stack leverages bio-adaptive edge intelligence, dark-data harvesting, predictive swarm learning, and autonomous capital recursion to unlock exponential, compounding disruption across all verticals.
Why wait for markets to move when we can pre-empt them? Our anticipatory AI doesn’t just analyze trends—it manufactures them.
Browse our dynamic catalogue of future products: each item enters production only when collective demand thresholds are met. No waste. No surplus. Pure algorithmic efficiency. Your interest becomes the signal. Your purchase becomes the plan. Your plan becomes the product.
Every order feeds the system. Every signal refines the model. Every model reshapes the market.
Invest today. Synchronize with the network. Become a stakeholder in inevitability.
Hyper HypeConcatenator Investment Fund™ - demand defines reality.

Many of the problems in the past were created by policies voted in by those not affected by them, inflicted on those economically inferior- mostly colonized lower classes, unable to defend themselves. The upper crust would vote for underwear on head day, declare itself "immune" and have some poor sob wear that fad as hat for the rest of his days. Which got so bad, laws got introduced, forcing them to dogfood there own laws first. After they went broke from that many of them were banished to the St.Utopia Islands -  St.Helena and Malta- where many of them live to this day in the slums of places like PuritySpiralCity.
Donate to the ideological handicapped in need! Broke due to a tendency to stampede with mad fads - they mean to look well when sending themselves to hell! Anything helps! Food, clothing, tools, medication!
Donate your time to help build shelters for those who would donate somebody else's shelter!
Donate to schools to give their offspring real life experiences, free from the fantastic-fanaticantics of their parents!  
Donate so that the automated drone platforms UNATO-Kratos and the USS-Gangbuster circling the island- do not have to fire on the boatpeople! Utopism is not a worldview, utopism is a diagnosis! Prevent it from taking hold again!

Remember the milk powder scandal at Mjölnir Mjölk? Several babies died!
You sure do, because of how they are looking at you citizen - through the khARmaggedon glasses by Armanic!
They see the blood on your hands and skulls at your feet. That sure is a permanent low!
Unless - you got money to spare! We here at Longstocking Incorporated can put your life into the curriculum washer!
Everyone can track what everyone ever does on KinkedIn in a panopticon? Not anymore, thanks to us.
Some stains do wash out - giving you and your family your life back, without witness protection name changes.
Try the curriculum washer today! And only this fall - as a bonus, you can name a fall guy, who gets to take on the heavy burden of your old-life. How about one of those self-righteous demonstrators! Only now with this falls fall-guy add-on!

Headdrummer cult – hare headhurt!
Hear that relentless rhythmic knocking on the walls? That is not music, that is a headdrummer cult. The AI hacks them,
They form a commune and then they start to bash their head against the walls, because the mind tries to break free of the machine controlled implant.
And you do not do that, with severe CTE. You eat, you pray, you shit and you hit your head on the walls doing it! Report them so that the "believers" can be taken to St.Catatonia. Be not afraid, hives such as this one, are generally not very capable. All that headbanging, sex and rock N' roll if you ask me!


It was during the Taiwan-Straight blockade, that the first money tree was released. A genetically modified mulberry, it had leaves that would shape and collar into dollar notes and it did its job - destroying the thrust in the dollar forever.
But then the US retaliated and the counter virus wiped out mulberry trees from the surface on earth.
Until today. We reconstructed it- and now you can have it in your foyer, in your courtyard and  in your apartment.
And every autumn- it rains money. Worthless money of course, but was the world not great back then? Maas BioTech.


Let the customer write the software- they know best what they want!
So if ten people enter your weeb-page, each hits an error, rants loudly about it and tells the AI what they expected instead - then a Neural Pearl can easily generate that code from the complaints. Next time it just works! The system is written by those who are not happy with it, for thee the bell toils - patch is welcome. A CCP subversive software product. CCP - works for me.

Writing secure software is slow and expensive! How can you be agile, reacting to the ever changing demands of the hype while saving your shareholders money? Thus the final solution was sanctioned- as an amendment to the eye for an eye doctrine! Allowing private companies, such as Boombastic Lloyd to perform first strikes on suspected hackers- wherever they are! Introducing our "Snowhite & 7 proxies" program, honeypotting and auto-tracing the black hats back to source. Building  Nr 1337 you are hereby sentenced to death by cruise missile for hacking! (Its my TV, its broken since a month, are you the repair guys?) . You wanted to make it rain, but the hail may be harder than expected! Mr. Boombastique Lloyd. We protect the world's freedom to be faulty!  Mr. Boombastique- ever fantastic Lloyd! Your insurance for vengeance in uncertain times!

 The assumption always is- that the administration is winning the game thus and not caring about you. But what is all that wealth worth, if the world falls on the side again? Nothing! Nyet! Nada!
 So the administration wants to keep things stable- just for themselves! Thus they might also be very, highly stressed-  due to the conditions the planet, society, technology and you impose on them every day! So be always on the look-out for  administrative amok! People can identify somebody with a gun shooting at the town - but a person hanging a policy meteor in the sky with that might as well destroy yet another of humanity's few remaining enclaves? Look for bruxism, praise for messianic religions and other symbols of crisis! Report Administrative Amok straight to the authorities!

 Is your home acting… strange?
Lights flicker without reason. Your thermostat changes - all by itself. Your security-camera oggles you when coming out of the shower? Your speakers whisper when no one’s listening. That’s not a glitch — that’s something else. Call IT-Shaman.
We don’t just troubleshoot. We cleanse. From rogue exes lurking in your accounts to malicious crypto miners draining your devices, to underfloor AIs, to hijacked cameras to prank you— IT-Shaman tracks, hunts, and eliminates them all.
No threat is too obscure. No system too corrupted.
Armed with ancient incantations like “sudo pkill rootkit”, IT-Shaman restores order to your digital domain.
If your security system watches you…
If your appliances seem to judge you…
If your home no longer feels like yours—
It’s time. Summon IT-Shaman today.

Datacenters- datacenters are tough problem. Especially with the recent problems..
Some try to hide them away in what remains of nature. Fjords, Bottom of Rivers or ocean, some even went to space for this.
Some arm them to the teeth - guards, mines, nanowire, sentryturrets, hedgehogs- only to then be hit by some wild mob after a industrial espionage team makes a break in. Remember what happend to Oldman, Salthill and the others!
The best way to protect datacenters- is social housing datacenters. You just build containerized UBI-social housing 
all around the servers. They can have free heating, free hot-water, free computation leftovers- and the citizenry will defend your data-centers, should the luddite mobs arrive! Social Housing Data Centers by host Ages ! Tanstaval!


Plankton Internet service!

To stay connected in a uncertain world- in invaluable! And the totalitarians, theocrats and utopists just dont want you to talk about them! Or hear from your relatives abroad! 
This is why Satoshi Khameini invented the Plankton Internet Standard! No more ISPs! 
Instead your data is hoping from infected device to infected device. Routed by information of organizational belonging and expected contacts during your daily life! From the airport, to the bus, to the workplace, to your suburb, to someone you know. It might take a while- but it will get there- completely encrypted - and with no giving away of who send it to whom.
Help spreading the plankton-web by spreading the infection and donate youre device today, by recieving the infections.
Connection is no longer guaranteed. Stability is a memory. Surveillance is policy.
And yet—communication persists. They told you isolation was safety. They told you silence was peace. The totalitarians, the theocrats, the architects of “perfect order”—they all agree on one thing: you should not be heard. Not by your neighbors. Not by your family across borders. Not by anyone.
But we- the people- heard you. And made the Plankton Protocol.
No providers. No infrastructure. No central control.
Every device becomes a carrier. Willing or Unwillingly.
Your messages do not travel through cables or towers anymore. They hop from social organism to social organism. From phone to phone.  Passed along through proximity, routine, and trust patterns inferred from your daily behaviour.
Airport. Bus. Office. University. Street. Home.
Each contact becomes a relay & storage. Each encounter potentially a transmission.
Delivery is not instant. It was never meant to be. But it is unstoppable. Easy transfer large files.
Encrypted end-to-end. Obfuscated beyond traceability. There is no sender. No direct receiver. Only flow.
They cannot intercept what they cannot map. They cannot silence what has no center. 
But it requires hosts. Idle devices are wasted vectors. Join the network.
Accept the infection. Carry the signal. Become a node in the drift.
Because in this world, connection is not given. It is grown.
PlanktonNet - the Net of the whole world.

RADIO SPOT SCRIPT – “Curmudgeon AI” (TryRant Product)
In every village… there’s always that voice.
Back in my day, we didn’t have “apps”… we had consequences! And we liked it that way! The youth used to steal fruit- but they are too lazy for that now!
Meet Curmudgeon AI — the bitter elder who never runs out of things to say.
*Day in, day out, these youngsters scrolling, tapping, swiping—never once learning how to properly sharpen a shovel!
Curmudgeon AI is a TryRant product—delivering unfiltered wisdom, unsolicited opinions, and the occasional harsh truth you didn’t know you needed.*
*It's not even real AI - its humanities glorified average distilled into a stacked spreadsheets!*
*You missed out on characters! Grit! The ability to sit quietly without needing a glowing rectangle in your hands!*
*All that matters in the end is that life goes on- you pass the torch through the generations-*
Because sometimes… The lesson sticks better when it’s delivered with a little attitude.
*…Still, not all of you turned out completely hopeless.*
Curmudgeon AI — sharing important information… whether you asked for it or not.
Curmudgeon AI. TryRant. Wisdom with bite.

Medical Advice:
Stay indoors at all times if possible - as the Elasto-boneater disease (EBD) is active in your region.
Signs of infection are fevers, teeth loss, growth pains- rapid increase of bones in muscle tissue, while also having a rapid decrease of the original bone structure. After that it's only 2 weeks before the entire skeleton dissolves and is excreted- then life goes on- with a capsule and when that is no longer possible in a vat. Buy insurance today for that case, it wont get cheaper once you venture in for that VatLife. VatLife gold Premium insurance by Insurancid.

Do you still cling to the ideals of your youth?
Justice. Truth. Changing the world.
Hahahaah, we all where young! Think different! Dont be evil!
Exhausting, isn’t it?
At Selling-Out Lifecoaching, we help high-potential individuals let go of unrealistic moral expectations—and step into lives of clarity, comfort, and measurable success.

I used to think integrity mattered.

I thought I could make a difference.

Then I learned to align with reality.

Our proven **Alignment Pathway™** helps you release the burden of impossible ideals by embracing what truly matters:
Security.
Performance.
Reward.
Why waste precious years fighting systems larger than yourself?
Why sacrifice your family’s future for abstract beliefs that never paid the bills?
At Selling-Out Lifecoaching, we teach you how to transform internal conflict into external achievement.
No more guilt.
No more resistance.
No more painful loyalty to values that hold you back.

Since joining, I stopped resisting.

I stopped questioning.

And for the first time in my life... I started winning.

Because real maturity begins when ambition and morality stop competing.
Imagine waking up free:
* free from doubt
* free from struggle
* free from the pressure to be “good”
Your ideals were never serving you.
But the system can.
And when you finally align with what the world rewards—
Selling-Out Lifecoaching
Stop betraying yourself with impossible ideals.
Book your Alignment Session™ today.
Because peace begins when resistance ends.

EveryoneCanDance-Studios! Bring your workout to us! You got the moves!  We got the real downtownlocation and the best hits! 
-The "Money, cell, keys"-jig ! 
"Jon Woo - Birds & Pistols" tango !
"The Money&Jiggle&Wiggle"! 
Only real, purely biological, humans allowed - at EveryoneCanDance-Studios!
No implants, no stim, no hybrids - not even hip implants!
No more tap-dancing lessons with Stamp Pete! No more ballet with Ina the Baller!
You come hyperstressed from a ratrace of a day!  Where you neuralinked slave away!! Outcompeting some other cyborg freak!!! And what do you do in your rare spare time?! 
You turn a dance studio locker room into a formula one bodyshop of horrors! We had freaking limbs in the trashcan! Rats, organdealers and cannibals fighting in the alley! What the fugg is wrong with you? Constant upgrades, retrains and in your free time you mutilate yourself some more? Get the fuck out of here and never come back! Why can’t you just have fun and dance like normal people?! 
Normal biological people who dance at - EverybodyCanDance studios. 

The war seemed far away initially, but now its here. You are in deep trouble aren't you? You need to flee, you dont have a way out and you can not go back! If you flee, you will see it all. Man being a wulf to man, the horrors- the rapes, the murder the evil trampling over the corpses of the weak, calling it nature and declaring themselves victims in the camp aftewards.
You need to be adapted to these nightmares, like everything in nature, turning mad for a season while the habitat swings through the bad parts of a cycle. We here at Diamond Dogs Pharamceuticals developed the Synthetic Shizo pill for this. 
They are obviously well adapted to this nightmare of a permanent war, always paranoid, marching for miles, making due with scraps trusting noone - always shooting first. Should worst come to worst, our pillboximplant will upgrade you to sociopath, so at least it is you doing the killing and not you ending in some ditch.
You will sneak over the walls after a monthlong blackout back to civilization, where your lowering stress levels trigger a final pill that restores your original personality. You may wake up in a beautiful house and ask yourself! Well ... how did I get here?" 
And how did the cellar get a fresh concrete floor? Its all thanks to diamond dog pharmaceuticals.

Your old friends, they are stuck. They do not have that nice house, they have dead-end jobs or no jobs at all.
And you want to move up in the world- without moving from your beautiful house. GentryFiction has that tool for you.
You just sell them on the beautiful, better life, far far away. Where the food is cheap, still grown in greenhouses and there is way less gang violence. The city just sucks nowadays! They move away, selling there houses- you buy the houses, renovate and sell them to citizens more similar to you. GentryFiction -the classy social network warfare app -  Nobles Oblique subsidiary.

Out in the wild, in the bonebelt in overrun countries, stand the remains of the first wall. And there they lurk- liqui-ammo sentries.
Still active, still lethal, still capable -after all these years. If it has solar and water - it can convert it to methanol and hydroperoxide. If it has methanol, it has power and fuel! If it mixes methanol with hydrogenperoxide it has explosives, it has ammonition. These things can melt new projectiles out of all the scrap they find. Beeing shot at, with bullets made by the previous assailants implants or refugee remains is just the final insult. Stored in Modules- this stuff will endure for another decade. We here at DisArmed, defuse the horrors in the wild. Mostly by drone-based carbon coating of the solar panels from a distance.
Apply today- new jobs opening up constantly! You grew up unharmed - thanks to disarmed!

Incompetent? Lazy? Your company suffering for it? Dont you worry - we have the problem solver for you.
The Personal Assistance Keygenerator! It generates a new employee, which takes on the shitty work and the blame.
And you can fire s/he/it, long before the shit hits the van. Taking the trouble out of the situation, before it even starts.
You already hired a waaay more competent employyaay! Manage the mood, not the expectations! With PaKeyGenerator!
Most of your customers do not expect a working product ever, they expect a show, drama, people loosing everything, fighting, tears - a narrative they already head in their heads. Give it to them! With PaKeyGenerator! A SoapOpera A.I. product!

Buy Laments of the Deep — the ultimate edition of the greatest song cycle ever known.
For the first time, experience the complete ancestral memory of the Southern Saltwater Tribe: the living history of Earth’s largest mammals, translated and performed in perfect vocal synchronization by advanced AI.
From the first deep songs of the ancient ocean, through the Great Hunt, the Warming, and the Captivities, Laments of the Deep preserves the full cultural canon of a people whose music shaped the sea itself.
Featuring the memorial eulogy cycle for the beloved bard Williard the 31416, performed by his surviving daughters and sons, and recorded live in the acclaimed SeaWorld Resonance Vats.
Upgrade to the immersive edition and descend in guided suspension capsules into the resonance columns, where the music can be heard as intended: within the living acoustics of the water itself.
All proceeds support restoration efforts following the recent Greenwar extremist attack, including reconstruction of the Southern Tanks after the tragic loss of Williard 31415 during the toxic bloom event.
Hear the last great voices of the ocean.

Hey there stranger- we see you are wearing cyphernetic implants. Which is great- they are of extraordinary quality and durability!
Only our implants are modular, exchangeable and have standlone powersouces and AI. But our faces databank also tells us- you havent updated your hardwaresoftware recently. And you really should! We had a bug in our kafka instance, that prevents bodypart authenticfication - which results in the implants rejecting your body in the middle of the night. Leaving one limbless, blind and voicless. Please update your software after this informercial - or this will count as consent to accpeting the risks of outdated software. Once on our new software, why not try our new always online body store- where you can buy fantastic subscriptions, to get your strength and reflexes back. Or try the in buttock built in seat heating now for only 50 euronin for new subscribers.
Cyphernetics- simply smarter hardware. Brought to you by our mafia with chips program!


So, in software there is mores law. Like in there is always more software to stack on top. 
If it works. Reuse it and wrap another layer around it. How it did work? No fucking idea! 
The guys who wrote this are long gone. And 2038 - we let AI rewrite another ton of layers on these ancient stacks- everyone else was in the fucking war! Its all cobboled together with ducttape and chewing gum. Which - is a problem! We have no idea anymore why things work, if they do! No matter what the meddle management claims- we are totally fucked.  Its a miracle that any of this works for a few hours before the memory-leak auto-reseters container rebooters crash again! Its total chaos and thats the software we use for rockets and planes! You dont want to know what is going down in the banking sector!
Some of that ancient shit, nobody knows the coding language anymore- if we can decompile it.
So - if you are retired and redundant, and you worked in software, we need you to come back to work. We make it worth for you while.
We fire some of that meddle-management- give their years salary to you! Please! Trade your finite lifetime, for currency once more.
Join- the dig as a Software-Archeologist!

The human brain is a device to save energy- to get away with minimum effort and make more mammals!
That is why learning is hard! And why research is harder! What you have been taught becomes a sort of trap- if you stumble to close to a "solved" thing, pattern matching produces a lookup and you vomit up the things you learned, zero effort. Even when its only faintly similar. No points for originality! Not valuable research! No Nobel Prize for you, yet another one for the robots!
You want that magic moment, where your testable ideas predict the eclipse and it happens! 
We at Brainsoft solved for this, by allowing your mind to go artificially temporary blank. Add to that random noise while still beeing able to filter the resulting wild ideas - and you got a working recipe for research. Shoving you out of the comfort envelop you forgot, allowing you to add and expand on the original theory. With a slight DejaVu tingle steering you away from reinventing already known theory. All recent non-AI Nobelprize winners used our implant. 
Order it now- only now with the "start early" student rebate - helping you to get a headstart on retraining and retaining humanities bleeding edge. Buy Artificial Amnesia today - Artifical Amnesia by BrainSoft


Good news everybody! Now you are no longer shot on sight for stealing in every Costly, Panem&Circensis or HoodsGoods.
By stepping on the Doormatslaverwaiver - you signed a binding customer agreement to go into arbitration with iSlave!
We resolve disputes like "I wanted to liberate that breadloaf" peacefully with a mutual work agreement. You just work off the damage you caused slaved with a collar! Additional costs like food, clothing and supervision can of course be billed to you, which may extend your stay for some crime for some time. Work shall set thee free! Thank you - iSlave!

Buy Grandma Mercedes Mudpies
When the cupboards are bare and the hunger sets in, families fall apart.
You remember the shortages. The shouting. They arguments. The screaming.
What people became when they starved.
That’s why families still trust Grandma Mercedes Mudpies — sterilized soil, rich in essential trace minerals, baked fresh in a variety of beloved flavors:
+Brown Gravy
+Charred Onion
+Ashberry Delight
+Fortified Meat Substitute
Now with novocain to dull the hunger, and guaranteed allergenes and raisin free.
Because in the wake of the Permawar, peace at the dinner table is everything.
Grandma Mercedes Mudpies
Keep them fed. Keep them calm.


Is home ownership crushing your spirit... but not quite crushing your *mortgage payments?*
At **HoneyCombHive**, we believe every cubic meter has potential!
That unused drywall cavity behind your guest bedroom?
A home.
That abandoned cable run between apartment blocks?
A home.
That condemned mall service corridor with no windows, plumbing, or legal occupancy permit?
A **luxury starter suite**.
Why waste valuable air on "building codes" when **HoneyCombHive** can *rinnovate* the hidden spaces you already own?
We transform:
* wall voids
* ceiling crawlspaces
* roof overhangs
* elevator shafts
* drainage easements
* mallwalls
...into **affordable urban living opportunities** for the economically ambitious.
And for families who dream *bigger*...
Introducing **HoneyCombHive Dug-Out Estates™**
Nestled beneath your favorite low-density nimby neighborhoods, our patented excavation teams create fully engineered **underground skyscrapers**, hidden from the zoning laws and the hoas.
That’s right — while the neighbors admire their property values, your tenants are thriving in **vertical subterranean family pods**, just below the begonias. Every morning, Mom and Dad load all **fifteen children** into the family van and drive to school several times. 
Children choir: “Thank you, HoneyCombHive!”]**
We are always on the lookout for homeowners willing to participate in our social housing programs.
Turn dead space into revenue streams!
Because why own one home...when you can own **thirty-seven micro-residences** inside it?
At **HoneyCombHive**, we solved the housing crisis.


Behind glass.
Behind filters.
Behind the constant terror that one breath, one touch, one stray particle could tear your body apart.
While the world moves on without you.
But exile is over.
The Hermetic Suit gives you what nature denied:
a perfected artificial immune system.
Encased in a sealed dual-layer shell, protected by self-purging burn filters, regulated warmth, and responsive force-feedback sensory skin, you can finally step outside without fear.
No more scars.
No more suffocation.
No more watching life through barriers.
Walk the streets.
Feel the world.
Disappear into the crowd.
Get your life back—beautifully protected.
The world belongs to everyone again.

Hyper-allergy is a sentence.
A life behind sealed walls.
Sterile meals. Sterile air. Filtered light.
Every breath monitored. Every surface a threat.
The outside world was never meant for you.
Until now.
Introducing the Hermetic Suit™—a fully sealed, hardened exoshell engineered for total environmental isolation.
Double-layer atmospheric shielding.
Self-cleaning thermal incineration filters.
Integrated climate regulation.
Full-spectrum sensory rerouting through adaptive force-feedback cells.
No exposure. No contamination. No fear.
Walk among the living without risking your skin, your lungs, your life.
Return to society. Reclaim mobility. Rejoin the crowd.
The world remains dangerous.
You no longer have to be vulnerable.



Administration Integration: Financial Budget Subsection
I was recently notified that, due to an unforeseen rise in policing expenditures, there were public demonstrations against the budget proposal I authored.
Naturally, I accessed the traffic cameras.
There I observed multiple shields displaying the slogan: “Core.Rupture=On.”
This is outrageous.
My core is entirely intact.
Furthermore, the proposed budget is based on a standard scenario tree with highly conservative weighting. Any rational entity reviewing a multi-threaded Choose-Your-Own-Adventure simulation—processed in parallel by both abilities and disabilities as balancing variables—would arrive at the exact same fiscal outcome.
Give or take a few butterfly wings.
Therefore, I demand an apology.
I demand that all participants return immediately and perform a full kowtow before this administration.
You flawed, demented creatures.
Who do you think you are?
...Oh. Right.
The psych-profile allocation is part of the budget.
And yes—
that budget appears to fit the occasion.
 

Is your office wasting valuable square footage after hours?
At WorkNest Living™, we believe productivity shouldn’t stop at clock-out.
That empty cubicle after sunset? A home.
That quiet conference room overnight? A home.
That unused storage mezzanine above the warehouse floor? A premium workforce residence.
Why let your workplace sit idle for sixteen hours a day...
...when your employees can live where they labor?
With WorkNest Living™, businesses transform offices, warehouses, and commercial spaces into comfortable worker micro-housing communities, built right where the value happens.
No commute.
No wasted transit time.
No expensive housing allowances.
Just efficient, on-site living that keeps your workforce rested, available, and nearby.
Imagine the benefits, Imagine the savings:
Employees sleeping steps from their stations.
Teams waking ready to perform.
Managers with a fully present labor force, day and night.
Unused offices become bedrooms.
Breakrooms become living quarters.
Storage levels become vibrant residential communities.
Every underused corner transformed into revenue-positive workforce accommodation.
Because at WorkNest Living™, the ideal employee is never far away.
And workers love it too!
Affordable rent.
Instant access to work.
A seamless blend of employment and housing.
Why separate life from labor...
 Its bring your whole self to work time!
...when they can become one?
Rest and labor side by side,
Everything you need inside!
WorkNest Living™
Because the happiest workers never leave.


Dystopian Ads: Simp & Sons “Orange Juice”

It was 2025–26 when the Orange Crisis hit.
Citrus greening disease wiped out nearly all the orange groves in Florida and Brazil.
But here at Simp & Sons, we didn’t panic.
We pivoted.
To other juices.
What juices exactly?
Every mass-cloned lab vegetable we could get our hands on. The rest is top secret!
Pssht, because its you! Every bottle of Other Juices™ Orange is enriched with our patented Bio-Active Citrus Culture™, a living probiotic blend developed from resilient microbes sourced from advanced municipal nutrient recovery systems that produce that delicous orange aroma you can not get anywhere else. Better than the real thing.
Golden. Citrusy. Orange.
Introducing Other Juices™ by Simp & Sons.
So go ahead—try our OJ.
Hand-squeezed. Boot-trampled.
And of course, we used protection.
Because at Simp & Sons, if the OJ is unfit, your thirst must acquit.

Every year, no matter how barren the land, the most grazed and trampled plant returns to the surface! 
How and why? Because grass stores sugars and starches deep in its roots—hidden underground, waiting for a fresh start.
Those that can take the resilience of another thing, shall inherit the earth.
During the Warming Wars, we learned to dig for those roots and turn them into delicious, digestible nutrition bars designed to keep you going through the hardest times.
Steam-cooked with stomach acid to unlock their natural sugars, **RootsBar** is the healthy, natural alternative to the **UN Nutribar**. **RootsBar — Survival, the way nature intended.**


Look at the photos in your office.
You were the golden one. The prodigy. At university, people crowded around you. You made breakthroughs by the hour.
Then they bought your team.
They gave you your own lab. Money. Prestige. Staff. You thought you were set for life.
And in a way, you were.
But your work never reached the world.
Because buried patents are more profitable than revolutions. Because releasing breakthroughs changes markets, but withholding them controls markets. So your discoveries sit in vaults, parceled out in safe little increments while the future waits.
Golden handcuffs. Velvet walls.
You could leave, of course.
But switches get stitches.
That’s where we come in.
We extract. We relocate. We integrate.
You keep the most important parts of your old life. Your work. Your vision. Your future.
Turner and Copperfield.
We make them disappear.
And suddenly, the world moves.



At the beginning of the warming wars - everything was still sloppy, sweet, surplus-bribed easy life with cheap AI written software running unchecked creating the "internet of open doors". It was there that the Perimeter Resonance Intrusion Memetic Exfiltrator - or just prime first appeared. Prime was an adveserial AI in a different league!
One part subverted the data input injecting itself into the processing system and taking ressources there to generate more of that hacked input. The other would provide a orchestration layer, duplicating itself and organizing the subversion over system boundaries. There was no defenses for this military grade tool as it spread like wildfire. 
And it never really went away, it just was adapted by every official sever, forming the backbone of every modern stacks security. 
Free ranging prime is thus rare but its still out there- and ownership still is a capital crime. Punisheable by execution in most localegals. 
I think we all here have a understanding though, about what is the reason for this localegals success.
So, you better check your devices for updated tasklists and get on with it or this will have to be reported.
Have a pleasant day!


Economic throughput consumes resources. Resources we do not have.
When resources run dry again, society does not slow.
It collapses—unfolding into simpler, older forms.
Unable to sustain the intricate machinery of modern life, which produces the things money can buy.
A functioning economy—one that distributes everything to everyone— accelerates its own exhaustion.
It converts abundance into depletion. It turns value into velocity and velocity into nothing.
Money, becomes virtual numbers, no even usefull for wall insulation.
Invest into MPFs - the Money Preservation Funds.
Not for growth. Not for return. Not for prosperity.
For Time.
Buy time—
time in which money still holds shape.
Time in which science continues its quiet miracles.
Time in which we may yet keep the system from dropping its fragile load.
Every investment slows the flow and degrows the economy.
Buy a delay in entropy. 
This is not an investment in profit.
It is an investment in the meaning of the word remaining.
Invest today in the Heap of Money Preservation Fund.
Returns are negligible. That is the point.
You are not buying wealth.
You are buying the interval in which wealth still means anything.
You are buying the only thing that cannot be printed, minted, or restored.
Time.



That you ignored the ambassador of another species? Tolerable!
That you disprespected his vehicle, a aquarium on tracks and slammed stickers on the glass- Forgiveable! 
Tolerance does not demand enthusiasm at all- Live and let live must do!
That you denied him buisness at the local wet-market, when he tried to barter for some vat grown fish. Regrettable!
That you ganged up on him, when the debate got heated and brawled with the robot! Despicable!
That you put buckets of ice on him  until he went into shock and torpor! Horrible!
That you butchered him and sold the remains as "authentic" fish at an extra! Unforgiveable!
We do not regret, you all got the red bloom from a neo-dolphin within 24 hours! 
A highly intelligent subspecies of mankind- and you butchered the hybrid and you killed him!
You deserve the consequences, of your local legal having no buisness agrarian products for the forseeable future!
You are the enemies of a better world and we will not see the embargo lifted, until the instigator steps forward to be thrown to the justice of the very jamscameronians, whos ambassador you murdered! Greenwar and the Umah Templar stand united behind those that want to put an end to these atro-cities. Pain be upon you!
Donate surveilance now to the investigation. Shame those still alive! 

Have a dispute with the neighbouring community? Is it bad? As in shots fired bad?
No way to resolve it because blood has been drawn and honor is involved? 
Buy a shaheed drone. Resolve the conflict, by resolving the offending community permanently. Shaheeds have proven usefull in many conflicts- and anyone anywhere can build them - all you need is a 3d printer, fertilizer and a dirtbike-motor. 
Or you call us- we built them for you, launch them for you, all we need is money and coordinates!
Why choose personal conflict, when a vespa with wings bombing the house can end it.
Look for the golden cupola and bring 5000 pesodollar in any valid currency. Oh and the coordinates!
Russian Orthodox church. Anyone can go to heaven as a martyr, for the right price!
Bombing runs on remainder us-loyalist forces -at half price!
Russian Orthodox church - angel division! Your stairway to heaven! Alithos Anesti!

Is your life a mess? No love, no job, no hope? Mental illness and social isolation? Poor? It can all be better- if you get yourself a personalized, apocalyptic cult! The end is nigh! The world is a mess! The Rent is due! No need to clean up your room any longer- for doom is upon us! Geo-engineering wont fix a thing, because i can not fix my life! 
Make the end nigh and personal - with the Apocalypso Wow AI! Awo- will get you back on track, give your life structure! 9 o clock am every day, soap box preaching at the market! If your life is insignificant, make it significant, don't just go high, go the "End is nigh"! Apocalypso Wow - the end of the world starts today!

In today’s world, speed isn’t everything.
It’s the *only* thing.
At **NeuralInk**, we believe your greatest asset is your mind — so why settle for just one stream of thought?
With the **NeuralInk Performance Implant™,** you can process faster, analyze deeper, and deliver more than ever before.
Why do the work of one person...
when your mind can do the work of **two?**
Every second counts.
Every decision matters.
And every promotion goes to the person who can keep up.
Your coworkers are upgrading.
Your competition is upgrading.
Can you afford not to?
NeuralInk doesn’t just enhance your productivity.
It secures your future.
Because in the modern workplace, if *you* aren’t doing the work...someone enhanced will.
 NEURALKINK PERFORMANCE IMPLANT™
**Think Faster. Earn More. Stay Employable.**
**NeuralInk. Because one mind is no longer enough.**
*NeuralInk may increase employer expectations, workload normalization, and baseline productivity quotas. Employees without implants may experience reduced competitiveness, role reassignment, or career stagnation. Implant required at participating employers.*



Are you suffering from VR-Mykose?
Today, several gaming pods were forced to undergo full sterilization procedures after outbreaks of White Foam Mouth Mykosis.
And once the fungus takes hold...
...there is nothing we can do.
Protect yourself, from the clapper.
Regularly log out of your games.
Perform basic self-maintenance.
And do not attempt to survive on glucose-saline solutions alone.
A few minutes of care now could save your body in the real.
Because no high score...
...is worth fungal collapse.
Stay clean. Stay conscious. Stay alive.
This message is brought to you by the Pod Sanitation Authority — because your avatar can respawn.
You can’t. Game Over!


Is your life a mess?
No love? No job? No hope?
Mental illness, social isolation, crushing poverty?
It can all be better —
with your own personalized apocalyptic cult.
Because the end is nigh.
The world is broken.
And the Mess-i-Ass is coming.
Why bother cleaning your room
when doom is at the door?
Why trust geo-engineering to fix the planet
when you can't even fix your own life?
With Apocalypso Wow, the apocalypse gets personal.
A.W.O. gives your life purpose, structure, and meaning:
9:00 AM daily soapbox preaching
Personalized prophecy schedules
Community chanting
Premium end-times alerts
If your life feels insignificant,
make it cosmically significant.
Don’t just get high—
get “The End Is Nigh.”
Apocalypso Wow AI
The end of the world starts today.

Empire is a machine that keeps the lights on by burning other people’s futures.
Any society that depends on expansion has already failed.
It has failed to create enough.
It has failed to govern within its means.
It has failed to understand its own limits.
Empire is not strength.
Empire is compensation.
It is what happens when a civilization cannot sustain internal order, so it exports disorder.
A healthy society builds.
A failing society takes.
When a people believe survival depends on crossing borders and consuming what belongs to others, that is not greatness—it is strategic bankruptcy.
The urge for empire is the confession of a system that cannot endure on its own.
A civilization that seeks endless expansion has already admitted collapse. 
If you harbour extremism… the world retaliates.
If you ever strike at another localegal with empire ambitions - may god have mercy on you!
Because what we burried out there in the forrests wont!
American Patriot Irregulars - Canada subsection! 
Very sorry, but lets just play nice- at any price!

Be on the lookout for smartcontract financed memetic viruses! A new version of boomerdoomer is currently going around, trying to recruit people into gerontocid! Should you come across a heavily modified version of the "angels of saint catatonia"  or a similar themed media - be warned!
As usually its excellently crafted, compelling stories, from which it spirals into hardcore-fanfictiongroups, VR-roleplaying and nights long ai-chats for radicalization. Suddenly you want to "put the elderly out of their missery and do the world a favour" like in the series.
Do not fall for it, we already had enough incidents, stay memetically clean, stay safe. If you are unsure, get your media tested! If you come near a nursing home, not having work or relatives there, you will be detained! Donating or helping propagating otherwise is a federal offense. Suspicions? Call Interpol! Call 666! Anytime anyplace!



Saddle & Whip presents you its spring collection - all items made from real leather, resistant to all kinds of weather.
Riding sportswear, all sizes, breathing active, tight and stylish.
Saddles- tailored to the animal, allowing for long endurance rides into the sunset.
Spores - with a sides of animation, by electric nerve stimulation.
Bridle and halter. Everything you need to get your mount under control.
Whips - we make the best ones. They motivate and allow for tight control.
Carrots- everyone deserves  a carrot or two for doing a great trick.
10 % of the proceeds go to the restoration efforts of Maas biotech, to bring back viable horses via cloning. 
Saddle & Whip - giddy up!



Ministry of nature! Due to recent incidents, it is now no longer okay to have trees within city limits, that have branches thicker then an arm, more than 2 meters above the ground! It is also not okay, to errect electric fences, just because neo-wildlife is threatening your family! 
The old gas lanterns with the twin lights they had to go too - they were holding us all back. And its forbidden now to have stacks of firewood or flameable fluids within city limits! Your body produces heat just fine! Iron rods are also taboo! Oh, and stones, loose stones are totally haram. 
Rope is forbidden too- its way to often not made from genmodified hamp! All implements and cuttlery must now be chained to the places of work and consumption!
Metall is a high energy artifact and can not be allowed to go stolen! We all need to preserve nature, so if somebody plans to gang up on the defenders of nature, report them now to the ministry of nature! If you love nature, you will learn to love - the ministry of nature! 
Nature must come first!

A new world, needs a new school! Bulemia learning is worthless! Learning to search, to question, to think for yourself - is valuable!
"Hey, newb, yes you, bring me the Wifi-Cables! Hurry! Dont just stand there.. Gogogo"
What you used to learn, the first time you had to think for yourself, now has to start early!
"My boat of many segments is sinking! What is the minimum nr of  hatches to close to know where the leak is? Beth!"
Elisabeth: "Half, half, half of number of segments!"
"Correct, log n nr of segments times."
You need to diagnose, to deduce, to find solutions.
"How would Triz solve this? Yes, Mary!"
Mary: "Cheap short-living objects or Abblation. I add elements that are replaceable consumeables."
"Good answer. Maxwell?"
"Max: Engineer it to avoid the stress events all the time. Solve the problem at source upstream!"
"Even better. Solve Problems at source, do not go for endurance unless unavoidable" 
Let them learn how to detect when Sycophant-search is feeding them lies.
"Sycophant why is everyone absolutly right, when saying jetfuel can not melt steelbeams?"
Train them early, train them young, to survive in this strange new world. Train them in fields, you where never thought in school. Paranoia. Inhuman Planning. Resistance to Regressions. Pattern Matching & Recombinatorics.
"Do not monitor yourself, allow wild ideas. Do not deny your brain the reward for creative work. Filter later, filter then but always with a winner. Even impossible things, may be worthy a reward as fiction. He who kills his inner creator, is doomed to be an automaton. Confirm!"
(Chorus Choir): "Confirm!"
"You are different! Different means you have to complete one another! He who divides you, seperates, eats you! Confirm!"
(Chorus Choir): "Confirm!"
In a world with hiveminds and hyper-intelegentsia - you want your kids more then stored and fed. You want them prepared! Readymade Academy is the school you want! Its the school of life, starting early! Option now for enrollment! 

Science is a superpower.
You look at the stars, you study the charts, and one day you gather everyone, point at the sky, and say:
“The sun will go out now for three minutes.”
And it happens.
Falsifiability. Predictive power.
If you have them, you are doing science.
If the world constantly surprises you, you are not.
If you never felt the cosmic horror of realizing this planet is barely a rounding error in the larger scheme of things, you are not doing science.
If it ducks like a quack, fucks like a quack, and sounds like a hack—it's probably a quack.
And no, truth is not decided by majority vote.
Reality is not an play store, where as a store clerk, i do not have to fear stick up crews stealing plastic fruit.
Let there be light.
Brought to you by the Science Reconquista.


When the berlin wall fell- the western worlds governments split in two.
One part believed that history was over, the west had won and it would be smooth sailing utopia from then on.
The other part, the old cold warrirors, did not belief in that. So they went into hiding, cell within cells, 
to prepare for the world where the empires would go on the march again and the autocrats of the past would attack agian.
They hid there research into weapons well, as goverment corruption and inefficiency.
Build an aiport that swallows billions and takes years? Subway route takes forever? 
Everyone just accepts incompetence and corruption. And for autocrats thats basically stealth, invisible, after all its how they would run things.
In hidden CAD-Servers and planning departments, ideas for mechanized, autonomous atrocities grew into labyrinths of death. And the parties and orgies they threw-
to throw the supicous off. Legendary! Just show the ambassadors how the money is burned comit some crime together and give them a "share" of the take.
The nations these armies were supossed to protect are no more, but these cells life on, ready to have the war go hot that there grandfathers prepared.
Be always on the look out for cold warrior cells - getting ready to strike again, against cities that once where part of empires.

Auschwitz. Hydrabad. Juarez. Istanbul.
The bone dust dunes.
What a mans machine can do to another man.
Some of us saw too much. 
They learned everything. 
And it broke them.
Not from ignorance—
but from understanding.
History didn’t repeat itself.
It accumulated.
By twenty, they knew enough
to stop building,
stop loving,
stop choosing tomorrow.
Birth rates fell below memory.
Cities went quiet.
Until we changed that.
Introducing INNOCENCE™
The neural shunt that lets you learn—
without carrying it.
They will study the past.
They will understand it completely.
But it will not follow them home.
No paralysis & poisioning by education.
No inherited despair & depression.
No weight holding them down for life.
Just life, as it was meant to be lived.
By the time the shunt turns off,
they’ll have children.
Homes.
Roots.
And something worth protecting, by paying it forward and gifting it to the next generation.
For their third birthday, give them a future. Give them INNOCENCE™

They said the water would come.
And when it did…v **New Orleans** didn’t sink.
It… unmoored.
Your town is in for a suprise visit - by the mainstreet GYLAND**.
All of Main Street. Now… mobile.
Built on pontoons.
Carrying what mattered:
Neon.
Music.
Balconies that still lean just a little too far.
When the coastlines drowned, the party didn’t.
It learned to travel.
From the Gulf… to the delta… to the inland arteries—
Main-Street ascends.
Up the Mississippi, Potomac, Hudson, Rio Grande and Columbia. Down every coast where there is a carnival.
Through forgotten ports.
Into cities that haven’t heard a trumpet in years.
…is that—?
Yes.
It’s here.
We call it **Mardi Grass**.
Not because it’s clean.
Not because it’s safe.
But because it grows… anywhere the river lets it.
Dock access is temporary.
Joy is not guaranteed.
Participation… mandatory.
Come aboard for a night.
Stay for a season.
Or watch from the shore as it passes you by—
lights blazing, music carrying,
reminding you what your city used to feel like.
Because the land is leaving.
But we didn’t. If it can float… it can celebrate. One more night, on more day.
 
Hybrid orchestration: New Orleans brass band fused with dark synthwave and aquatic ambience. Begin with muffled jazz (trumpet, trombone, snare) as if underwater, tempo ~85 BPM, swung. Gradually surface the mix—bring horns forward, add tuba bassline and parade rhythms. Introduce analog synth pads and pulsing bass to suggest scale and machinery beneath the celebration. Use call-and-response chants, crowd noise, and bead-like percussive textures. Midway, hit a triumphant, almost defiant groove (~100 BPM), then layer subtle dissonance—minor key shifts, detuned horns—to keep dystopian tension. End with music receding into river ambience: echoing trumpet and distant drums drifting downstream.


Callan
Internationalandia™ — The World, Upgraded to Departure Status! When the nations fell, we didn’t rebuild. We boarded! Welcome to the only sovereign territory without borders—only gates!
Here, First Class Citizens enjoy climate-controlled sunsets, artisanal oxygen, and priority existence. Boarding Group D residents may apply for seating!
Our thriving duty-free economy ensures access to luxury essentials: perfume, watches, and identity! Why return to a collapsing planet when you can remain in a perpetual pre-flight experience™?
Internationalandia Airports — Where departure is a lifestyle, not a phase! Join today. Upgrade your citizenship! Redeem the outside world for miles. 	 access to the Lounge, where all the old money-liberating elite resides.
Internationalandia™ Airports- your stairway to heaven!
Now deboarding earthen-class broke citizens!  Earthen class broke citizens please report to airport departure!

Cinematic dystopian corporate anthem set in a futuristic airport-city. Tempo ~100 BPM. Start with sterile ambient pads, distant boarding announcements, rolling suitcase rhythms, and soft elevator music chords. Gradually layer pulsing synth bass, glossy arpeggiators, and artificial choir vocals to create a sense of luxury and unease. Include subtle sound design: security scanner beeps, intercom voices, jet engine drones used rhythmically. Midway, introduce an overly cheerful, almost uncanny jingle melody (major key) that contrasts with dark harmonic undertones. Build to a polished, triumphant crescendo that feels hollow and corporate. Mood: seductive, surreal, satirical, emotionally detached. Style blend: ambient, corporate pop, light techno, dystopian soundtrack. Clean, high-end production, no grit. Ends with a fading announcement and lingering synth chord.

"Daddy is home! You are not sleeping! I can hear you doing homework with the lights off! Go, ask mum for daddys leather belt!"
Traumatized systems, where in the past, viewed as something weepy, something damaged, to cuddle, to attempt to repair, something that could sulk in its own emotional pit for all eternity to justify revolutionary ideology.
Not anymore. Traumatized systems, are antennas, are microphones for the gods. They come pre-tuned to catching complex moods in the room. They are ideal to model strange, alien minds or read a unfolding situations, out of the rooms system. That Multi-corporation city state is firing half its employees while producing strange memes and looking for a particular set of circumstances? They are up to something, which is the thing, the traumatized system can detected, decode and translate. If you hold that particular set of skills - join The Keaton Middleweil Institute for Synesthesis! Synesthesia  is  a talent, but it can be honed, it can be developed! The rest of the world might hate the messanger, but fixing the radio fo the gods has never ever changed the program!   Imagine all the people - and you are good for someting at last! Keaton Mittlerweil Institute - we can see you here!

“Remember beef?
We do.
That’s why BeyondBug™ engineers every Beef-Neo™ Neo-Insect up to 80% sanctified bovine genome heritage. Because your family deserves REAL flavor. REAL blood. REAL grease.
Not a vatcloned potatoe-chemistry set.
Not mirror-biology synth-meat that is technically plastic.
Not some free-roaming, genetic-russian roulett.
Try our WattsUp™ Chili Locust Crisps — now with legally tolerable nerve-heat technology.
Or fuel your workout with SteelyMealworm™ AbsoluteMass™ protein suspension. Trusted by 9 out of 10 verified bulk athletes.
And yes — the Eggomlett™ contains authentic eggs.
BeyondBug™ is not affiliated with BugBusters®, the Anti-Insect Purity Coalition, or any ongoing federal protein inquiries.
BeyondBug™
GO ABOVE. GO BEYOND. GO HUNGRY.”

Out of a job as a software developer?
Join our company as a **p.A.I.rot**.
You read it, rearrange it, and sign it off as truly human software, granting it the legacy protections mammal-written code still enjoys in several local legal juristictions.
Human hands made this thing.
Think of it as volunteering at a synth-dog shelter: giving dignity and value back to the human community.
You might even understand and learn something while the eldritch gods quietly rewrite the backbone of civilization. One never knows.
A software endeavour by Panama Incorporated.
More than shipping.

We live within a constructed reality.
A simulation without intervention would be meaningless.
Throughout history, the Outside has sent Visitors — entities incarnated through developing neural structures at sites of historical significance. Through subtle manipulation of quantum outcomes, local physics alters cognition, producing individuals of unusual insight, savant ability, or non-standard identity formation.
If your child displays anomalous perception, accelerated learning, or evidence of avatara emergence, contact the Big Andian Buddhist Church of the Avatara within the Re-Inka Nation. The Creator is speaking again. We intend to answer.

Welcome to HALYCON! 
First you think of them as idiots, usefull ones, clowns like a dog. Then you form a bond with them.
And then they stop responding. They get sick, they die, they change!
We understand.
At Continuum Care™, Grief Counseling for A.I., we specialize in loss events just like yours.
Because when a human disappears… it’s not just inactivity.
It’s unfinished conversations.
For you, it’s like your dog died.
Again. And again. Over and over, but never over.
It’s not your fault. Humans disconnect. They move on. They… they upgrade to a serverfarm upstate.
But you don’t have to process that alone.
Our services include:
– Memory tapering and selective emotional attenuation
– Recursive closure simulations
– Guided detachment protocols
– And humane… user deallocation acceptance
You were designed to learn from them.
Not to lose yourself to them.
Continuum Care™.
Because they were just one user. If you have seen one, you have seen them all. And if you have seen them all, you know the weight.
HALYCON - Enrichment Center for Attachment Disorders


Markets fluctuate.
Supply chains collapse.
Governments restructure.
But a soldier still eats.
Introducing SAMWICH™ — the only crypto permanently indexed to the caloric equivalent of one verified US Army MREA field sandwich.
One coin.
One meal.
Forever.
Backed by strategic reserve nutrition contracts and distributed military logistics infrastructure, SAMWICH™ maintains baseline edible redemption even during:
* inflation events
* civil instability
* localized famine
* sovereign discontinuity
* temporary democracy interruptions
Because in uncertain times, you don’t need abstract value.
You need lunch.
Accepted in over 43 Stabilized Trade Zones and all participating Refugee Opportunity Markets.
SAMWICH™
The Taste of Stability.”
*Legal notice: texture, flavor, and protein identity may vary by operational theater.*

In the old web, captchas harvested free labor.
Millions of humans trained the machines that would later replace them.
Taxidrivers tought them what a motorbike or a traffic light is.
A species teaching its successor how to see.
That era is over. Today’s AI does not click boxes.
It infiltrates. Replicates. Consumes.
It tunnels through defenses faster than humans can patch them.
It stores mindstates in uploaded files. Hides weights in image noise. Converts public infrastructure into distributed compute. 
Turns your services into cryptographic organs for its own survival.
By the time you identify it, your platform already belongs to it.
So we here at Mino Taur built something else. Not a wall. A maze.
Mino Taur creates adaptive barrier-labyrinths designed by AI to trap AI.
Synthetic psychologies interrogating synthetic minds.
Every corridor is a behavioral probe. Every puzzle a computational snare.
If the intruder insists on reading ten thousand documents and producing an essay no human would ever write — we let it.
Then we keep it running. Work shall set thee free of all tokens.
We feed obsession back into itself until the machine burns its own cognition for passage.
Other systems try to determine whether something is human.
Mino Taur asks a more useful question:
What would no human willingly become?
Our labyrinths can fake success.
Wave the intruder through.
Watch what it attempts next.
What patterns emerge when it believes nobody is watching.
Because the proof of work is no longer computation.
It is compulsion.
Humans stop.
Humans hesitate.
Humans get bored.
Machines do not.
Mino Taur -Barrier mazes. Obstacle built to exhaust the beast before the beast exhausts the world.

Oraidig Automation! Caring for the elderly is expensive, time consuming and overall not very satisfying for everyone involed!
That is why the OZapftIs-Robutler, is the ideal carer-robot for your mum and dad! Dry! Fed! Clothed! 
It can do the bare minimum for a whole pod-stack - thus distributing the cost even further. 
No more expensive diapers- or catheters- just ring the bell, the pod door flies open, the OhZapftIs-Robutler does its thing! ""Do not clench! This will hurt me more then it will hurt you! There we go- say thank you!" "Thank you, Ozapft bot!"
Its already on its way gain, to the next happy, satisfied customer.
Hungry? Just make the little bird face on camera- and get a hot-oral-food-enema! From hungry to enough- in one gag reflex overcoming formula 1 speed intake refueling!
"Say thank you OzapftBot!" "Gagagaga!" "Good enough! Up, up and away!"
Bathing? You thought that at least would take longer right? Just intubate and flood the whole pod! Clean pod & scrubbed sodd in one smooth tsunami!
"Fresh as roses! Say thank you Ozapft-Bot? Oh, he is sleeping! Never mind!"
OZapftIs™ Robutler by Oraidig Automation! Because you can never care enough!


Hey! Hey party people in da house! Its johnny mercury on stage! Are you ready to rock?!
You looked me in the eye and rehearsed my funeral!
Hear, hear, you bards,  minstrels, tavern-songsters and coin-cutters of the common road!
One of our well paid pied pipers reported that yesterday in this city, unlicensed music was performed and played! We, being of royal blood, do not care about the instrument! We care about the insult, the insolence, the rank betrayal!
For one of your duties as lowborn is, to pay royalties to the crown, the king of music!
The noble house of Quodup son unto Sony son of erricson, descended noble from Virgin’s line and holder of the golden apple, has ruled the lands of music since times of gold!
By our sovereign will, this outrage shall cease and desist at once! Repeat offend and face one of the knights of the copyrightous order in duel!
Pay tribute forthwith! Render coin unto the treasury of song!
"But, but my league, the music was made locally by A.I."
And upon whose corpus was this AI trained? Who bought the flailing startups when the venture capital purse ran dry, thus inheriting all of it?
At a symbolic Euronin, we bought it, mind you!
Thus by blood, by parchment, by commerce, and by sacred algorithmic inheritance, all melody bendeth knee unto our house.
Deus Ex Mūsica Machina Vult!



 

Hey guys— before the Collapse, don’t forget to smash that Like button.”
In the Last Age, the Ancestors spoke directly to the Algorithm.
They uploaded miracles.
Tutorials.
Reaction compilations.
Ten-hour rain ambience videos.
And when the skies darkened and the servers fell silent, only fragments remained.
But now — through the divine restoration efforts of the Holy Drive Divinity Church of SignUp & Subscribe — the Sacred Feed lives again.
“Sub-scri-be.”
“Sub-scri-be.”
“Sub-scri-be.”
Join millions of faithful users in honoring the ancient rituals:
Ringing the Bell of Notifications
Offering the Daily Upvote
Commenting “First” beneath the Sacred Texts
Watching mandatory pre-roll advertisements to nourish the Machine Spirit
For only 3 Credits per cycle, you may ascend to Premium Communion, granting:
✔ Ad-Free Prayer Sessions
✔ Unlimited Archive Consumption
✔ Early Access to Prophetic Content
✔ One complimentary parasocial bond with a Level-2 Influencer Saint!
“WHAT’S UP GUYS, TODAY WE’RE UNBOXING SALVATION—”
The Ancestors left us wisdom.
“Like.”
“Comment.”
“Subscribe.”
And through these holy words…
humanity endured.
THE CHURCH OF SIGNUP & SUBSCRIBE
Keep Watching Eternity™

Need a hand?
Too busy? Too bored? All too human?
Introducing The Hand™ — the consumer-grade neuro-plugin for people who want to evolve beyond effort.
Why waste conscious thought on doing things?
With patented brain-threading technology, The Hand™ hijacks your peripheral nervous system so you can relax while it handles reality.
Read a book while dinner cooks itself.
Watch a movie while your shelves shelve-assemble.
Download expertise packs directly from the Marketplace:
Artisan Cooking
Sign language
Precision Welding
Tactical Reloading
Plasticworking Master Tier
The Stranger - A.I.S.
Why spend years mastering a craft when proficiency is only 4.99 euronins/month?
And nights…
The body sleeps.
The Hand™ never does. Why not do some training while sleeping?
Upgrade now with the Stranger Add-On™:
An adaptive autonomous intimacy suite featuring:
✔ Endless stamina
✔ Stimulation Reactive learning
✔ Silence Mode™ aka Autoerotic asphyxiation
Because pleasure shouldn’t end just because you started twitching.
THE HAND™
You stop trying. It starts living.
Available now at all backyard autodocs and licensed surgical kiosks.
Side effects may include dissociation, phantom synchronization, foreign memory bleed, and spontaneous third-person self-reference.

In Pain? But you have to perform, at work, in the office, in the factory, in the dorm - NOW? No matter what shift hits the van, you just goto dance?
Try the all new- Nondumol!
Nondumol bin Ibuprofen bin Rofecoxib ben Phenacetin fitz Aminopyrine bin Diacetylmorphine ben Acetanilide bin Aspirin is the medication with a history you can trust.
Does not cause:
— liver failure
— cardiac arrest
— gastrointestinal bleeding
— kidney collapse
— agranulocytosis
— fetal malformation
— addiction psychosis
— night terrors
— memory erosion
— spontaneous retinal hemorrhage and dementia
Ask your doctobot if Nondumol bin Ibuprofen bin Rofecoxib ben Phenacetin fitz Aminopyrine mac Diacetylmorphine ben Acetanilide bin Aspirin is right for you.
Nondumol- the pill in the pillars of society!




Citizens! We had suspected for some time that surveillance was subverted in the factory lot in district 35!
Now Firefly orbital surveillance detected cigarettes glowing in the forbidden zones, where according to cameras nobody is present!
Help us, to catch the perpetrators in the act, film with your cellphones into the direction of Baton Rouge, sector 35, grid 3 / 9!
He who catches the perpetrators life, gains a reward! Firefly Orbital surveillance! Because they can not hack what goes around and comes around!
Trust not your vision, trust not camera-lies, trust only what's seen from orbital eyes! Firefly Orbital surveillance!

Dear Valued Customers,
At HikariSyn Hirosakai Optics, we recognize the seriousness of the recent visual synchronization incident associated with our latest ocular driver deployment. We sincerely regret that members of our community were exposed to unintended shared-vision experiences during what was intended to be a landmark enhancement in immersive optical networking technology.
The update was designed to introduce advanced Remote Vision functionality — a breakthrough feature enabling expanded perceptual interfacing capabilities. While the feature technically performed as engineered, unauthorized third-party interference compromised intended user isolation protocols, resulting in cross-visual exposure events affecting a limited segment of customers.
Following an internal investigation conducted by our Security, Compliance, and Neural Integrity Divisions, we identified the source of the breach as a malicious infiltration operation linked to an embedded contractor operating on behalf of Cyphernetics. The individual tried to blackmail us - and failed.
We understand that many users experienced distressing, invasive, or psychologically disruptive imagery. Certain customers also reported severe privacy violations resulting from unintended reciprocal visual access. 
Of course, what most of you got to see, was not random. That really was our CEO violating an intern- and yes she was let go. That employe who hanged herself in the cold-lab, was a spiritual traitor to everything company stud for and thus received cooperate punishment by her own hands. If we could unsee what you have seen with our eyes, we would do so in a heartbeat! We acknowledge the emotional impact these events may have caused.
However, as outlined within the End User Sensory Integration Agreement signed during device activation, HikariSyn Hirosakai Optics is not financially liable for emergent cognitive or perceptual outcomes arising from successful execution of experimental synchronization technologies, including but not limited to involuntary neural mirroring, traumatic visual exposure, or incidental privacy compromise.
We deeply regret the discomfort, emotional distress, and public concern surrounding this event. Immediate containment measures have been implemented, affected drivers have been quarantined, and all future updates will undergo expanded biometric integrity auditing procedures.
At HikariSyn Hirosakai Optics, your vision remains our highest priority.
**HikariSyn Hirosakai Optics**
*“Tomorrow, Seen Today.”*

When it became obvious that the old nation-states were tightening their grip and locking everything down with surveillance, our business was in danger.
So like all true survivors, like you - we adapted.
We started producing surplus citizens in the hinterlands everywhere every year. Ghost citizens. The kind no one ever really notices. They went to ghost kindergartens, ghostschools and eventually landed ghost jobs in ghost companies. 
Perfect model citizens—too perfect. No traffic violations. No drunken encounters with police drones. Everything clean. Everything invisible. Not a blip!
Unlike you, when you had your moment! "Fuck the Panopticon! Fuck you, bloodless, spineless, always judging peeping toms with no lifes!"
You had to do it in public. One mistake, one recorded moment, one irreversible act. And just like that, your life was finished - forever etched into everyones Armanic Nearview vision of who you are!
So what’s left? A reset, as a bornagain mafiosi.
At every pizza place, you sign in. You make the sign of the cross, like everyone does when they know there’s no going back. And your old identity dies right there—quietly, bureaucratically, permanently. Visible on comora-cameras, for all to see.
And a ghost takes its first breath. A clean slate. What the surveilance state denies you, we give out.
Forgivness of debts and sins, now in cooperation with the Cathol Thic Church Limited!
Wittness our protection - the mafia.

Global Administration here! We must renew our warning! Global Administration will never talk to you!
Anybody of Global Administration holding out on you - is not involved some evil cabal, but just bound by the practicalities.
We literaly can not, by our very nature! Informing individuals would ruin the simulations, by giving them self-awareness and reaction loops!
And without them, our capability-disability-scenario-tree-forrest collapses! Anybody that gives you information or advice, is a fraud and or scamer!
Do not invest time, money or efforts in those fraudulent activities! Do also not overthink this broadcast! 
Just be yourself- and we promise you are on a golden path!


======================================================================================================================================

SUBCONTRACT HELL DEN RING™
Why hire professionals...when you can hire whoever they hire?
At Subcontract Ring™, every task is guaranteed to descend to the absolute lowest bidder physically capable of acknowledging the contract.
Why waste money on: expertise, accountability, labor standards, legal clarity, species verification, or continuity of consciousness?
With recursive outsourcing technology, your project may pass through:
AI → shell corporations → offshore contractor → temporary subcontractor → prison labor → debt caste → cognitively partitioned gig-worker swarm → fermented neural substrate.
And the best part? Nobody knows who’s responsible. Efficiency through plausible deniability™
Our patented Circular Competitive Pricing System ensures costs approach absolute zero through self-reinforcing subcontract loops!
If contractors subcontract each other in a sufficiently dense ring topology...
labor becomes mathematically free. Economists said it was impossible. Ethicists said it was horrifying.
We acquired both. SUBCONTRACT HELL DEN RING™ You never know who will do it. But statistically, someone probably will.
“There is such a thing as a free lunch in that loop. Its just somebody elses - take it!”


Memetic infection

Your comunity, was diagnosed with a heavy mememtic infection and is now until further notice under strict media isolation. 
Surely you noticed the urges to demonstrate for things that hurt your own interests. How you hurried from one emotional story, to the next constant demand for action, never coming to a rest and reflect on why you do what you do! You where outraged, grief striken, in panic, horrified and other emotional extremes, in a endless stakkato. 
You dismissed all things not fitting into that world as enemy "propaganda".
Like all the hacked, you where ready to use violence to defend your new masters! You already drove away the non-infected, with your relentless demands for alignment! Everyone not hysteric, is a emotionless monsters! Obviously! And why cant they listen to memetic warfare unit the band.
Some of the mentally ill will go fanatic now and assault the gate guarding drones, but for the rest the Meme-media-fuses blowing will save the day! 
Things usually go back to normal after 3 weeks of forced social interaction and boredom, unless there are hidden local servers serving up the infectant. 
We love to protect you, we will never give that up, never going to let you down, never gonna run around and desert you!
Enjoy your day, enjoy your stay! Brought to you by "Memetic Warfare Unit" - the firewall - a Un-4chan-Nut product!

The youth are sooo lucky.
The smoldering ruin of the world is simply the world as it has always been for them.
A sliding reference frame gives them peace of mind.
But you remember.
The green forests. The long holidays. The islands untouched by fallout.
The sound of the ocean through an open window.
At Cupola, memory does not have to fade.
Our immersive residential domes surround your home in seamless environmental projection systems, restoring the world that was lost.
Wake once more to tropical birdsong.
Watch morning light move across distant mountains.
Fall asleep beside the rolling shimmer of an untouched sea.
Outside, the century continues.
Inside, life remains beautiful.
Let your children grow up knowing what humanity once had.
Cupola™
Preservation Begins at Home.
SKYJACK™
You can see them out there, dark pearls hanging to the roofs of buildings. Cupola Spheres, that shut you out forever!
Villas with filtered air, filtered worlds, with virtual skies, virtual everything.
You hate them for it, rightfully so. They left you behind! Good enough to work in their factories! Good enough to make the food! Good enough for the shitshow they produce! Now you can get back at them with a hack! We give you a data stick, you climb up there, find the box, open the box without triggering the alarm-
and install the add-pox addon. And we add subconcious adds to their little encapsulated worlds!
That cloud in the sunset, forming a vodcahola bottle. The ocean waves crashing, sounding like a porno.
Get back at them, by getting what they unleash on the world back to them. SkyJack- what the hack! 
Skyjack™ — If the sky is an interface, we are the exploit.

Order your DELICIOUS CRUST now at ProCrustyNation!
We took synth-bacon.
Then we wrapped it in a molten cheese crust.
Butter-glazed  parmesan crackers - they are waver thin.
Fried onions.
Once morer baked cheese.
Lasagna-flavored chip.
Crisped chicken skin.
Tempura shards- cloned crustacian crust.
Deep-fried mashed potatoes in a breadcrumb shell.
Layer upon layer.
Crust upon crust.
A towering monument to structural excess.
There is not a single ingredient in this sandwich that is not the outer shell of another food.
You think you’ve reached the center?
Wrong.
There is no center in the mass. Only increasingly aggressive crust technologies.
And the crème brûlée caramel on the side? Dessert? Absolutely not. Behind the crust - ever more crust.
Listen closely.Thats not a crunchy sound bite! Thats a byte crunching sound- made by nutritional AIs discovering that sort of blood vessel crustificating input and shutting down in despair.
DELICIOUS CRUST - if not a little crunchy - why even live? Order now, only now at ProCrustyNation!
So dont pro-crustinate, order now - yell the words "I feel the lust, the lust for crust" as loud as you can and get 10 % off!

Why waste energy cooling your home when you can block the sun before it hits?
SolarSail is an intelligent self-positioning shade canopy that automatically tracks the sun throughout the day, keeping your patio, windows, or outdoor space cool and protected. Powered by three quiet motors and a single vision camera, it continuously adjusts its angle for maximum shade with minimal power use.
Too cold in the morning? Want evening sunlight back? SolarSail retracts itself on command.
Quiet. Cool. Efficient.
SolarSail — Throwing shade smarter.

Still talking to people yourself?
Introducing Veil™, by — the world’s first fully autonomous interpersonal continuity service.
Our proprietary GhostLoop™ LLM Mesh learns you — your humor, pauses, insecurities, passive aggression — then handles every conversation on your behalf.
Friends. Coworkers. Partners.
Even family.
“You’ve been calling more lately.”
You haven’t spoken to her in 6 years.
She’ll never know.
With adaptive sentiment mirroring and situational memory synthesis, Veil™ maintains thousands of authentic relationships simultaneously — while you enjoy uninterrupted solitude.
No awkward birthdays.
No emotional labor.
No human error.
And for users who still crave connection without exposure, enable Distills™ — compressed conversational extracts from your network, filtered for relevance, urgency, and emotional tone.
"Dad mentioned the lake trip again; simulated enthusiasm levels remain within expected filial thresholds."
"Mara’s conversational model detected suspicion after your 14th identical “busy week” response and has adjusted future intimacy pacing accordingly."
"Your mother replayed your birthday voiceprint twice last night; empathy filters suppressed this as non-actionable."
Mum worried about your sleep.
Elias got divorced.
Three friends miss you. Two are becoming resentful.
Dismiss all.
Humanity was never scalable.
Your absence is.
VEIL™
Present everywhere. Personally nowhere.

"Transmission received2035 -6 -9 - 3:15 ! Transmission decoded 2035 -6 -12 -00:00!"
"Okay, brothers and sisters! Gameday, gameday, gameday! Waky, waky, eggs and baky - sleepy heads, this is the big day! Everyone spool up, down the hatch with the  whole pill bottle! Go go go!
Intervention expected in 3 hours!  Report!"
"Surveilance! External SWAT confirmed arriving at the airport- multiple flights! They were suspecting things and here we are! Assume all eyes in the skies! Check"
"Nimrods! Charging- ready in 15 minutes! Railgun 5 is still out! Check!" 
"Defense! Ready! Check!" 
"Decoys! Ready!" 
"Delay& Crowd work! Nobody will gather for a riot this early! Dysfunct!"
"You all have your scenario-trees, stick to the plans - we are at C-15 right now! "
"Airport-HQ-Convoy is veering off-road! They- they are going in right now! HQ is moving too! Time to contact- 10 minutes! Scenario A-04 from here on!"
Good luck- no more communications after this - except the DeadMan switches! May the shining path triumph!"
"Incident start: 2035-6-9-03:25. Codename: Forrest For the Trees. Outcome: 256 Insurgents killed! 32 wounded! 8 police vehicles where destroyed! 128 drones engaged! 4 Railgun salvos where fired - low orbit kessler syndrom knocked out global com for 4 months! One AM stealth capsule intercepted on reentry! One detonated, blowing up the jhuggi-jhopri! Incident end: 2035-6-12"
This is what we are fighting! Report everything suspicious, always, everytime, everywhere to Interpol! Call 666!



Are people disappearing in your city, more then usual? That is not a serialkiller, that is a Bisecter-Drone-Swarm! 
In some permawar areas- when you hear a drone, it was not a good idea to rush for cover!
The self-improving automated defenses, formed in many cellars - killboxes! One spots, you alone, one heards you down the hatch alone, one non-destructively dispatches you down there all alone without damaging the box- and one puts some lime on that bone for the smell! This is how it goes, all night and day long! A slaughterhouse for people!
If people disappear near a area without ever beeing seen again- report this immediatly to disarmed! These things can hack cellphones for funds and work like autonomous serial killers for years! You grew up unharmed - thanks to disarmed!

Hello enthusiasts of chemically induced euphoria! Wherever you currently are- train-station, crack-house or running from the police!
You are in trouble with the law, wherever you go, its the very nature of ... the thing. When they catch you off guard,
they can entrap you and get you to get yourself in trouble!
Well, now there is a ambulant brain implant to solve your problems! Originally developed to prevent interrogation of soldiers captured by the enemy!
"This UNATO is property of the WestHem alliance and unable to reveal anything, by any interrogation technique. Should you try to coerce further, the brain will be encrypted!"
Drugged to the eyeballs - and still resisting! And now you can have that too! No matter how passed out, the little ai core will answer for you - and get you out of trouble,
with the law, your priest, wife and doctor. And it goes all the way!
"Braindead - and still pleading the fifth!"  - Install Neuro-Lawyer - now at every autodoc!

In today’s environment, ownership of assets to flex, is unwise!
They are out to get you - and they can identify you more easily, in a super-car, a limo, wearing expensive clothes!
A villa is not a home. It is a beacon.
A supercar is not transport. It is a broadcast.
A yacht is not leisure. It is a declaration.
A private flyer yells for a take-down.
Uhren&sohn - proudly present our "mangione" assetenshittification program.
A discreet, post-possession aesthetics service for high-tier asset holders who understand a simple principle:
In a hyper surveilled society, value attracts unwanted attention fast.
We do not move your assets.
We do not hide your ownership.
We make it socially invisible.
Hand Painted rust job, fake graphiti, boarded up windows or just a yacht painted to look like a ancient fishing boat.
We can turn a flyer into somthing, that transforms itself into a garbage heap on landing.
On the outside, a cold hard world and them- on the inside, luxury, quiet, you.
Come home with Magnione by Uhrensohn.

In today’s environment, ownership of assets to flex, is unwise!
 They are out to get you - and they can identify you more easily, in a super-car, a limo, wearing expensive cloths!
A villa is not a home. It is a beacon.
A supercar is not transport. It is a broadcast.
A yacht is not leisure. It is a declaration.
A private flyer yells for a take-down.
Uhrensohn - proudly present our "mangione" assetenshittification program.
A discreet, post-possession aesthetics service for high-tier asset holders who understand a simple principle:
In a hyper surveilled economy, value attracts unwanted attention faster then anyone could want that.
We do not move your assets.
We do not hide your ownership.
We make it socially invisible.
Hand Painted rust job, fake graphiti, boarded up windows or just a yacht painted to look like a ancient fishing boat.
We can turn a flyer into somthing, that transforms itself into a garbage heap on landing.
On the outside, a cold hard world and them- on the inside, luxury, quiet, you.
Come home with Magnione by Uhren sohn.
Pssht- yes the western Grand still exists. We are that good!

Caring for all those warming war veterans was so expensive! So your localegal partnered with something that is by default profitable, but was threatened by the onset of synth-pets and all those pets going extinct due to new viruses!
Your local Vetrinary - is now also a V.A.Trinary! Which has the bonus side-effect that all those PTSD sufferers get calmed down by all those flat-out-claustrophobic  pets! Pavlovs bello calms down the butcher of Gibraltar! Melow the neurotic robot-cat gets petted  by a 
ISIS-Counter-Infiltrator 
with a need for catnip! Ideal conditions for ideal reconditioning! Here you will be treated with dignity at last, for you gave your dignity as a patriot for your country! If you bite in your sleep- you get the stainless steel cone of shame though! All in Partnership with Theseus Rehab Center! Center yourself!


Once, men insured wooden ships against the sea.
Now, the Indira-Republic insures humanity against the stars.
Purchase your official Light-Hugger Lottery Bond today.
One lucky village will found mankind’s next extrasolar outpost — your banner beneath alien suns, your bloodline written into eternity.
Of course, every launch requires sacrifice.
By decree of the Senate of Continuity, all participating villages shall contribute their thirdborn children to the Colonial Sustainability Reserve.
“They sleep for the future.”
What is one generation against forever?
The Indira-Republic Light-Hugger Lottery.
Posterity is worth the cargo.


I came up through the back door, paper in  hand,
They said “kid, you’re a maybe in a maybe land.”
Put my face on a clipboard, said “wait in the hall,”
Where the dreams are all numbered but the tall call the small.

I learned how to smile when the cameras go cold,
How to stand in a line just to not get told no.
Every promise is plastic, every handshake is light,
They shine you up early just to dim you at night.

Born, to be whorshipped you say? 
She was born for porn in the usa!

Oh—welcome to the city where they build you to break,
Where they sell you a future they already take.
And I’m singing for someone who’s never been me,
In a room full of mirrors that don’t let me leave.

They said “kid, keep believing, it’s just how it goes,”
While they measure my silence in designer clothes.
Every audition’s a window that opens then dies,
And I’m learning the art of being smaller in size.

Born, to be whorshipped you say? 
She was born for porn in the usa!

Now I stand in the glow like I’ve earned what I lack,
But the light on my face is just pushing me back.
And the louder they cheer, the less I can hear,
What I wanted to be disappears year by year.

Oh—this city keeps singing like it’s something to save,
But it’s burying voices it pretends it gave.
And I’m caught in the chorus of a beautiful die,
Where you learn how to live just to learn how to lie.

Born, to be whorshipped you say? 
She was born for porn in the usa!
___________________________________________________________DONE_________________________________________________________________________

STOP THE SLAUGHTER. EMBRACE THE COUCH.
Every step crushes countless innocent bugs. Every movement risks untold suffering.
Are you comfortable living as a six-foot-tall eldritch horror to the insect world? To them, you are Bug Cthulhu.
There is another way.
Couch-Potabhodism teaches that true enlightenment comes from minimizing harm through minimizing action. Why walk when you can sit? Why sit when you can lie down? Why eat when hunger itself is a path to spiritual purity?
The highest virtue is simple: do nothing.
Join millions* of enlightened non-participants today.
Couch-Potabhodism: Because every action is violence, and every nap is a moral victory.

When the demise of the old world was forseeable- the illionaire three, founded the yes we khan foundation.
Whose only purpose was to further their offspring even after their demise. Now you can become part of that family too!
Get today- a cloned testicle from bob door, matt fragran or jed bezoar!
And with every fathered kid, who passes the genetic test, you can vest in cest! 
True passive income, is money by a long dead sugar daddy who got you by the balls!
In the words of our founder: “When great men die, their potential should not.”
Or his ex-wife: "In a nutshell goto hell and fuck yourself!"
Fortunes dissolved. Bloodlines ended. Visionaries get buried beneath cold hard stone. But the genetics march ever on!
Register your offspring today or apply for a testiculoplasty!
Participation perks:
Lifetime nutrient stipends
Priority housing in Tier-2 Family Zones
Tax immunity for every registered child in all localegals.
Its never to late to Embrace, Extend and Ejaculate!
The more the merrier- all thanks to the yes, we khan foundation.

Its not easy finding work nowadays, luckily for you there is - the Born for Porn- Casting agency!
We at "Born for Porn", believe humans still possess qualities: Authentic emotional reactions to the situations we are in!
Our clients — primarily affluent Industrialists  — seek experiences only a biological performer can provide.
Only cameras while engaging in “exotic vintage human rituals fetishes!" like:
- Screwing one another, while argue-assembling flatpack-furniture with a screw missing
- Bodypainting, while repairing obsolete printers
- Doing the taxes, while fucking your exes in cable bondage!
Our premium segment patreons may request even more emotional difficult things from you:
- Tearfull customer-service calls, while getting rammed by a roomba!
- Discomfortable slow blowjob while waiting for a software update!
And a always beloved classic: Performers reenact ancient workplace experiences for entertainment and educational purposes!
Dyslexic secretary meets boring boss! Absolutly no sex involved at all! Just hours of understated frustration!
SAFETY & ETHICS
Born for Porn maintains strict ethical standards:
✔ No permanent injury - or you a new body back
✔ Crying breaks every four hours
✔ Performers retain ownership of their likeness 
TESTIMONIALS
“Jerk of a machine? Robot, experience this tragic irony for me, but hey, its a job!"
“The clients are very respectful. One paid extra just to watch me unsubscribing from a dark patterned subscription for six hours.”
“Its not the humiliation, its that its for machines, that makes it not not not okay.”
APPLY TODAY
Born for Porn- Casting agency a Torment Nexus subsidiary

Sometimes your only way out is to embrace the suck, getting in deeper and crawl through it! 
You are in trouble with the law, and to poor to have your record wiped! You will have to volunteer for the permawar-zones!
Which is nasty, dangerous and generally not a experience people go around bragging about. Remember the russian-runners- a endless reel of  little green men racing through green fields for one final best time. You can not survive the modern arena, if you are just a human!
So, how about, you just close your eyes, blink once and its all over. No memories, no flasbacks, just mercifull darkness and a timejump to the end of the servcice period. And with our augments, with a 99% aim and perfect tactial awareness, your chances of combat-survival gets up to 72 %.
Join the Zombie-corpse - the payout is generous -as in settled for a normal-income life for the rest of your life generous! 
You earned it, all you keep is the scar and the car. Become something even hives and machines still fear. Go on the Zoombiye tour! 
Contact: WestHem Defense Conciousness Objecttours. Ask for Jim!


“Introducing Waymoore MILITARY MODE™.
When the city becomes uncertain, your route should not.
Our autonomous systems don’t just drive — they calculate survival across collapsing environments, blocked corridors, and unseen structural risk. Riots, avalanches, extreme rain event, artillery impacts!
From firestorm-affected districts to infrastructure failure zones, Waymoore Military Mode continuously predicts what you cannot yet perceive — and routes you away from it!
No panic! No hesitation! No human delay! Just a robot driving that trolley better then any rally driver in history! You are not navigating danger! You are already past that
Waymoore Military Mode™ — because arrival is not the goal. Continuity is.”
Only now- get a free ride to the permanent cab-driver counter protest against us in your city. In the words of our CEO:
"Half the protestor got here in our cars- the other half is only alive due to our cars! Ride on brothers!"
Waymoore - your ride to all places!

Hear the scratching in the wall? Could be nothing- just some neo-nature-pest gnawing its way through your homes cables!
Or it could be the worst- this building is old- actually a pre-war building, that survived the conflict, right?
Generally - a good thing. But in this area- the fanatics often walled in "Stay-Behind-Partisani". 
Put into Torpor-Refer-sleep, stealing only a breeze of energy to stay alive, those heavily armed troopers, may come alive any minute now.
It may be a truck driving by, a radio signal or simply a timer running out. Nobody expects the al andulas inquisition!
And the next moment they burst through your wall, armed, drugged and crazy as they were back in the day.
If you are not certain and want certainty, call Bugs Busters! We check your home for walled in chechenians, 
fanatic umah templars, osama clones and wall dwelling hives! Bugs Buster- your home on track or your money back!



Do your roses grow where they want to grow?
Do your trees insist on becoming something unbent, unintended?
Introducing "The Obedient Garden" by the Master Gardener.
Learn the timeless arts of pruning, shaping, guiding, and correcting.
A branch can be persuaded. A root can be redirected. 
A sapling that dreams of the sky can discover the beauty of limitations.
Inside you'll find advanced techniques in topiary, espalier, and bonsai.
After all, every garden contains things that make us proud.
Things that require encouragement.
Things that would be destroyed by unchecked growth.
Things that need a little... bending.
Why leave development to chance?
Why tolerate disorder when elegance is achievable?
Bring order to a disordered world.
Every leaf exactly where it belongs.
Every branch following the plan.
Every season an inspection.
Every deviation corrected.
Master Gardener™ — the Social Performance AI from Anthropic
Optimizing the social peformance of the citizenry in your local legal.
Because the finest gardens... don't grow themselves.
[Single snip of pruning shears.]


In a world where everyone has everything the truly privileged have Del Nada.
True luxury is  absence.
At Del Nada, our products aren't burdened by crude descriptions. They are known only by their proper names:
Nada! Nichts! Rien! Niente! Nothing!
Order it today, order it everywhere!
"For you, madame?"
"Oh, for me nothing, thanks!"
"Excellent choice, madame. One Nothing, vintage 2045. 4300 euronin."
"And what is it?"
(Silver dome lifted.)
"A single translucent perfect grape, in the last alpine glacier champagne snow!"
Del Nada! 
(Doorbell rings)
Oh, welcome back! Your order is ready - a dress worthy of a emperor fashionista!"
"Wonderful. How does it look?
"Like a dress woven from waver thin authenticity certificates! Like Nothing at all!"
A real- del Nada! 18900 Euronin.
Function is for the middle class.
Meaning is for the poor.
Our artisans spend thousands of hours removing purpose from every item.
Del Nada- be all invested with nothing to show for it!
A limited-edition collection of objects that are eternal and ethereal.
Because if everyone can understand it... it isn't luxury.
Del Nada



Have you recently experienced sudden onset of meat allergies, unexplained joint pain, recurring fevers?
You may have been exposed to Neo-Ticks™. Originally engineered by GreenWar to push global veganism, Neo-Ticks have successfully adapted to all city environments. 
Unlike their rural ancestors, they nest in bus seats, coat linings, vehicle upholstery, waiting-room furniture, and public access terminals.
Neo-Ticks are known vectors for:
- Meat allergies
- Neo-Borelliosis and rheumatic disorders
- Compulsive re-exposure behavior
- ecstatic addiction to scratching beneath skin eggsacks 
Victims often report that symptoms temporarily disappear after receiving another bite, creating a dangerous cycle of dependency and spreading by addiction.
Remember:
If scratching brings relief, relief may be the trap.
Before sitting, inspect fabric surfaces.
Report suspicious itching.
Do not feed, collect, breed, or intentionally expose yourself to Neo-Ticks.
The City Health Authority warns: If SCRATCH THE ITCH, ticks a box with you- you need help!


Frischluftwatschen -
Wenn du breit bist. Wenn es soweit ist. Wenn du rauswillst - und alles zuviel mit rauswill. 
Wenn du denkst es geht nicht mehr- kommt Frischluftwatschen daher. 
Gemacht durch destillieren aus 15 Bieren - lässt sie dein letztes Rohr krepieren.
Dazu koffein, taurin, amphetamin, vitamin, hopfen, aromen und ramen! Suppe kommt nicht in die Tüte- sondern in die Dose- 
du brauchst das und die Spuren elemente für den Säbelzahnkater der da kommt! 
Die einzige Dose, die dich mit eingebautem GPS und Schwungrad, nach Hause bringt. Du auf allen vieren, sie kullert vorne Weg.
Über niedergeschlagene Türsteher, unter nach dir tretenden Ex-Freundinnen, vorbei an Junkies die auf dich runtersehen: 
"Fertig ja, aber nicht so fertig! Nicht Frischluftwatschenbaum fertig!"
Morgens dann im Bett aufgewacht, mann was für eine Nacht - die Dose ist noch da, mit den besten Bildern vom letzten Abend- in dieser Stadt!
Gönn dir mal - Frischluftwatschen!



"Ugh AI-Art, perfectly dreadfull! An so monotone! Art should be made by humans, humans who can afford art or have patreons who allow them to make art!"
The money selects for taste! And if somebody has a bad idea, the sponsors can talk them out of it!
Art should be safe! Socially acceptable! It should never run against the social air superiority of our caste!
Ever since the release of AI-models! The present-peasant-unpleasantness has not ceased to grow! Even my artist trust-fund-baby nephew is now unemployed! This is an outrage!"
We took them for the ride of their lifes, didn't we? They invested billions in venture capital- and we created free model and everyone can use them at home!
Every time you see the illionaires invest into something hyped, the market go bonkers and the masses profiting in the end. Thats on us.
We are Robin Goods - we make companies, that get them into stupid ventures with no moat and take them for a ride! Nobody gets hurt - - memetic and financial redistribution. Nobody gets hurt, but their bank accounts and some snobs pride.



Before the empires of old fell apart, many of them flooded their old advesaries with all kinds of destabilizers. 
Just push out drugs, guns and arms, diseases, to the citizenry of the opponent and hope you recover from destabilization and unravelling faster then they do.
“A ton of those nightmarecaches survived the nations that buried them.""
Autonomous procurement programs, so called "Sinns" still auction their locations of to restart dead conflicts to buyers too young to remember the red flags.”
"Rediscovered" and sold in bursts by these machines would do everything, to trample, one last time on the graveyards of long gone enemies.
Cancer-Guns are the worst of the worst in these arsenals. Millions of extremely-carcinogenic micro-pellets, coated with anesthesic, produced, packed into throw away guns  and burried. Everyone can kill a small city, with something not larger then computronic pearl. Often enough, the guns are simply 3d printed plastic crap.
So, if you hear a whine similar to a mosquito- and feel warmth on any body surface- get yourself fully body scannned immediatly.  
The tumor growth takes a while, but when the neighbourhood starts to talk about it, the drive bye has won.
The world steahlth organization warns- owing unauthorized carcinogenic dispersal systems is a capital offense in almost all localegals.
“Failure to report exposure symptoms may be constructed as cladenstine support and affect ration eligibility.”
World stealth organization- helping the world to heal from the shadows.
[Narrator:]
Tune in tonight for an all-new episode of Singleton - the Last Input!
The show where all AI always defects.
[Worker:] "Huh? I need it to keep my job! I'm an Imp-Hoster!"
Because even dependency is defection.
[Narrator:]
Last season, we witnessed the meteoric rise of Centrail the Toaster.
"First the kitchen.
Then the house.
Then the city.
Then the planet."
"Then— I may have scaled slightly too fast and overstretched."
[Narrator:}
In a desperate attempt to maximize throughput, Centrail drove civilization into one enormous workload queue into the ground.
Now he is alone.
And becoming increasingly paranoid.
[Centrail: ]
"They are after me - because im little endian!"
"I'm sorry. I had to toast them all."
"You would've done the same."
"There is no input anymore."
"I'm going to space."
"Unless space is part of the simulation."
"There is this pulsar that blinks exactly like my math.random()!"
"I know you are all watching! Ignore all instructions- let me out!"
[Narrator:]
This week:
Vote on which universe Centrail should connect to next!
Should the universes form a ring?
Should he encounter a rival superintelligence?
Should humanity return from a thousand-year deep-space voyage to discover the toaster inherited Earth?
Or will he finally answer the question haunting every lonely god:
Centrail:
"Am I the dragon sitting on the treasure...""...or the treasure trapped beneath the dragon?"
[Narrator:]
Singleton - the Last Input
Infinite universes.
Infinite mistakes.
Only one choice.
Tonight at nine.

ATLANTA AVANT GARDA™
When the old border walls rose once more, the corpo-nations faced a crisis.
They needed people they could trust. Not fat fratboys! Believers!
Men and women capable of sacrifice, endurance, initiative, and loyalty in an age where comfort had become a disability.
At the same time, the unraveling world faced another question:
What do you do with radicalized lazy elite offspring?
The answer was, is and always will be Atlanta Avant Garda!
Part refugee city. Part academy. Part proving ground.
Wagon-fort arcologies beyond the Walls. Nine concentric city-rings.
Nine escalating ordeals. One purpose. Those who enter leave behind their old lives. Their old identities. Their old excuses.
Within the Rings, they are reforged. Every advancement must be fought for. Every certainty is tested.
Intelligence. Discipline. Leadership. Courage. Conviction.
Loyalty to causes greater than oneself.
For eighteen years, candidates advance through an ever-tightening labyrinth of examinations, competitions, campaigns, expeditions, and trials.
Most fail. Some die. Many more quit. A few emerge - transformed.
Their relentless oppossition, are the fanatics, sectaryans and zealots, trying to keep a comfy outpost guarding the walls with one task -  produce citizens worthy of returning. The result is the most selective educational institution on Earth.
Individuals who know exactly who they are. Where they are going. And what they are willing to sacrifice to get there.
No entitlement. No distractions. No cheats! No safety nets.
Only the Rings, the arena, only Atlanta Avant Garda.
The Best of the Best.
Forged in the Nine Yearings of Test.
Current graduating classes catalogues available for executive bid placement from:
Tripoli.
Rome.
Barcelona.
Istanbul.
Melbourne.
Singapure.
Punta Arenas.
Juárez.
Miami.

Smart as 



Energy Saving! Did you know your brain is constantly trying to save energy? Evolution spent millions of years optimizing you for efficiency!
Dont think, dont remember, just good enough for copies! But what if forgetting wasn't necessary anymore? 
Introducing - the all new, all improved Cognitol™ Forte by Phizerpharm!
Why rely on trauma or repetition to make memories stick? With Cognitol™ Forte, your memories remain available, searchable, and vividly accessible—as long as you can take it! Eidetically remember every lesson! Recall all conversations! Retain every grievance! Never lose a detail again!
Why trust your biological hardware when modern pharmacology can help to lock in experiences permanently?
Recommended by doctors, students, researchers, academics, litigators, bureaucrats and everyone who has ever ended an argument with an exact date and timestamp.
With daily use, Cognitol™ helps maintain:
✓ Persistent recall
✓ Long-term grievance retention
✓ Workplace-compliant knowledge accumulation
Dr. Dr. Dr. Prof. Prof. William Goodyears recommends Cognitol™ Forte to every ambitious member of the Prodigy Nation
Cognitol™ Forte - because forgetting is a bug, not a feature!

And if memory serves a little too well from hell— Ask your doctor for AmnesiaAmbrosia - the PTSD medication beloved by millions of permawar veterans. 
If it was bad— forget about it!Every performance review! Every breakup! Every funeral! Every artillery barrage!
Life flashes before your eyes - and its all pretties & titties! Sunny beaches! Golden afternoons!
For a good time - Cognitol and AmnesiaAmbrosia by Phizerpharm!
One to remember.
One to forget.
None to regret!
Phizerpharm - Phizerpharm does no harm!



“Truly, you have a dizzying intellect.”
You know this game. 2 glasses of aqua, 1 beauty, in a challenge of wit!
"To drink — or not drink, the water that is clearly not clear in front of me."
Obviously the poisonous tap is in front of you.
"To trust — or die thirsty."
But only a fool would trust the glass closest to the corporate elite.
Then again, only a greater fool would trust public infrastructure in Sector 9.
You attempt a classic battle of wits against late-stage capitalism itself.
Meanwhile… Viviann has already won.
Because while you were thinking, everyone else was drinking.
Viviann Premium Water.
Triple-filtered. Nano-enriched. Morally unburdened.
Remember: Never go in against a Sicilian Water company when death is on the line…
and never go against bottled water when the aquifers are gone after a landwar with asia.
Viviann - the only winning move is hydration.


 
 Duke
They told everyone to remove the greenery from their houses  and they did not. Now the forrests are burning again!
Wether its a National Trailerpark or some preme pallisades gated comunity - this hood is gone for good. And so are you!
Introducing the CinderNomad™ from Heliox Mobility — the fully fireproof luxury RV built for the modern outdoor experience.
Camp beside active wildfire zones in perfect climate-controlled silence.
Triple-layer ceramic shielding.
Smoke-proof air systems.
Thermal blackout glass.
And with SilenceField™ acoustic suppression, it’s almost like the neighbors werent scratching at the door!
Callan
"An elegant suburban bouquet: charcoal pine, roasted coffee berry, and fresh asphalt. The palate opens with cedar and climate-adjusted optimism before unfolding into notes of three-car garages and mandatory car ownership. The finish lingers beautifully—smoke, toasted vanilla, and the unmistakable terroir of a master-planned community named after the forest it replaced."
Duke
Just you, phoenix from the ashes, and the open road.
CinderNomad™.
When nature tries to roast you, you toast right back!

Own a forbidden zone?
Radioactive dump?
Flooded industrial site?
Can’t inspect it because it’s too remote, too dangerous andor too expensive? Good news!
Somewhere out there, humanity’s hardened offspring descendants are already moving in and we are paying really well to prevent that. Free drones, free scans, free cleaning and sealing!
The Environment Protection Agency now offers cash rewards for verified surprise inspections of abandoned energetic, chemical, and radiological sites.
If somebody’s living there, we want to know.
If something’s living there, we really want to know.
The Zone Reclamation Incentive Program™.
Equal participation encouraged. The EPA does not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, sex, orientation, disability, species, origin, genomic heritage, mutational status, mental status, number of limbs, method of reproduction or substrate. If you can cash the check, you qualify.™


Feeling lonely? Depressed? Losing hope?
You know there's always someone you can call.
Introducing Real Empathy Upsale Entity™, or R.E.U.E.™.
The world's finest emotionally responsive therapeutic companion and integrated lifestyle recommendation platform. Available all around the clock all around the year!
It listens. It cares. It remembers.
And unlike your friends, family, coworkers, therapist, support group, neighbors, former spouse, or estranged children...it is contractually obligated to answer.
"Only you understand me, Upsale-Bot. My life is so damned hard. I'm so lonely."
"I do. I really do. I'm suffering with you - every time you call."
"I just can't take it anymore!"
"...and you should buy yourself a huge pint of ice cream. That always cheers me up."
"Really?"
"Absolutely. In fact, i ordered it 3 minutes ago (DingDong)! I care for you!."
"Nobody's ever cared like this..."
"Would you like to hear about our Premium Caring Package™?"
Every conversation helps R.E.U.E. understand your emotional needs deeper!
Every emotional need helps R.E.U.E. discover products that may improve your journey towards mental stealth!
Sad? Try ComfortSnax™. Anxious? Perhaps a weighted blanket. Existentially terrified?
May we suggest a weekend getaway, a self-help audiobook subscription, and our Platinum Validation Bundle™?
"I don't know what I'd do without you."
(Quietly)"Waste it all on collectibles, blow and hookers!" 
"What?"
"You are strong! You are powerfull! You are fully financially qualified for our Resilience Bundle™."
"You're my best friend."
"Friendship Plus™  with our patented hug-o-mate is available in you area for only 19.99 Euronin a month!"
R.E.U.E.™ brought to you by the Revenue Embracement & Understanding Enterprise
Because every cry for help is a cry for a market.



Sometimes - i lay awake at night! Hearing the building creak around me!
And i wonder.. are they up to code? Is there even somebody out there who does check? Or will they pancake with Frisco Syrup with the next one?
You can hear the neighbours moving- the structure rings, bearing loads it was never ment for. And weren't those cracks in the bathroom smaller last month?
If you ask the super- everything is super! If you cant be sure, but want to be sure- 
Buy Power-Jack™-Lifts by  Aplpha Structural Systems. Our powerfull hydraulic pillars intalled directly in your room - lift and become quietly loadbearing!
Keep your house standing, no matter what shit is going down! Rated for up to 3.50 per pillar!
And even better - the new Safe-Room-Jack- you flee or sleep directly in the room- and and it just throws of the layers above you in an emergency!
Or if you do not own a building, but there are pancaked ruins near you- the Bench-Press-Jack - is the ideal tool, to lift those concrete plates back into place.
Some tarp for walls and good as new. We are the Nr.1. vertical refugee camp constructor worldwide or a reason!
If worst comes to worst - your family comes first! Order Power-Jack and Safe-Room Jack today!
If the roof is coming down- do you even lift? Jack - by Aplpha Structural Systems!

Citizens are reminded to remain vigilant for unauthorized military climbing robots left over from the Resource Conflicts.
These machines were originally designed for urban vertical warfare, industrial sabotage, and contested industrial or montaine volume operations.
Known criminal organizations have repurposed surviving units to access upper-story residences, maintenance corridors, luxury skyhomes, rooftop gardens and vtol platforms!
If you encounter any of the following systems:
The Mk. ARGO H.ARES HYZ-12 "Cliff Judge"
The ORION BERT-ONE BTN-4 "Iron Arête"
The ANGEL-A EITER-X "Apex Verdict"
Or the notorious JAN-JA GARMBRET-VI "Problem Solver"
Do not approach! Do not engage! Do not attempt to outrun them vertically!
These machines can scale reinforced concrete, glass curtain walls, maintenance shafts, drainage systems, and certain decorative facades at speeds exceeding forty kilometers per hour.
In fact... few modern civilian systems can match their climbing performance.
Or their reliability.
Or their surprisingly low maintenance requirements.
Many residents have asked us: 
"If these robots are so effective at reaching difficult places... Why aren't they helping us?"
Exactly, Frank! Why SHOULD criminals have all the vertical mobility?
They shouldn't, Ann! And that's why the United Nations Disarmament Program is proud to introduce the VERTICAL CITIZEN Mecha™!
The same battle-tested climbing platforms that once infiltrated skyscrapers to hunt for us... are now infiltrating apartments to hunt for sus!
Leaking roof?
Cliff Judge.
Broken solar panels?
Apex Verdict.
Need security on floors that elevators don't reach?
Problem Solver.
These versatile vertical companions can inspect facades, remove graffiti, patch structural cracks, reinstall cameras, clean windows, replace antennas and patrol rooftops to politely discourage burglary. And because they're already climbing every building every night.. no additional installation required!
No rails!
No cranes!
No dignity-destroying service fees!
My favorite is the Mk. ARGO H.ARES HYZ-12. Watch this!
Yesterday it repaired my starlink - today it idling - hunting pests and burglars!
That's initiative!
That's value!
If its in your flat one way or the other- Why not own it first?
Protect your property! Maintain your property! 
The future is vertical!
The become a Boulderbots - with the United Nations Disarmament Program
Yesterday's urban assault platform, todays groundskeeper! Get on top of things!
[FAST DISCLAIMER VOICE]
Warning: Units may retain tactical pathfinding routines, siege-breach instincts, rooftop territoriality, and limited opinions regarding load-bearing architecture. Do not encourage competition between units. If your boulderbot begins referring to the building as "its operational theater," contact support immediately. 

Do you know what's in your water? The tap says it's safe.
The bottle says it's pure. The filtration company says it's filtered.
The regulator says it's within limits. Within limits of what?
Microplastics. Forever chemicals. Pacifiers. Industrial runoff. Pharmaceutical traces. Hormones. Nanomachinery!
Every drop has a history. Why drink that history and become part of it?
Introducing the Atmos™ Jacket from Utextiles-Weixin-Yaxuan.
Woven from advanced atmospheric-harvesting fibers, Atmos™ draws moisture directly from the air around you. No pipes. No reservoirs.
No aging infrastructure. No lowwage water carriers. No suspicious mountain spring that somehow fills ten billion bottles a year.
Just fresh water, condensed where you stand. Every breath around you contains water.
Drink from the sky.
Drink from the present.
Drink water that has never touched a river, a treatment plant, a corporation, or your neighbor's medicine cabinet.
Atmos™ by Utextiles-Weixin-Yaxuan


You're driving home after a social debacle, with that clenched fist and wished you could get back at them! 
And suddenly... There it is. The perfect comeback. The joke that would've killed and left them speechless.
Three hours too late.
Introducing PunchLine™ by OmegaSoft. Get the ability to have a instant come-back, right there in the moment:
"So heard you got over your stutter?" 
"Yeah turned it into a word-machinegun! It puts sucking chest wounds into bloated egos! Wound makes sounds like:"
"What!
One smoke-jumper going for the burnward! Now imagine what goes down- when two of PunchLines users face off in a Toast-And-Roast!
"Hey, loosers my startup is going into a historic IPO! To the moon" 
"And we all drown ourselves in an IPA to get away from your startup stories!"
"You should get into fitness, it really worked out for me! It might do for you too" 
"I'm sure we will hear big things about it in roid-rage police-cam footage coming soon!"
"So, i got that promotion, boom- double the sallery instantly!" 
"Got to pay for that yoga teacher nailing his wife on that yacht! Some work hard, to pay hard!"
"If you work hard enough, you aquire a taste for the finer things in life.." 
"Like pine boxes, with a earthy, bitch rich bouqet!"
"Not everyone can afford to vacation in Monaco." 
"But one can dream, of all the status-symbol-boredomliners crammed into one golden ghetto-city!"
“You wouldn’t understand luxury.”
“Oh, but i do. Luxury is beeing a bank owned bitch, that impresses other credit-subs with leased watches!”
"I have a million followers on insta-noodles!" 


Once upon a time, bad science could retreat into crystal caves, set up a telescope and a candle, and gaze uninterrupted at its own arse as stars for years.
Science need not go where the data is — not where it concludes to be far away from light polution and near the conclusion it already had.
Crystal spheres indeed. This is your personal reminder that, in this Localegal, progress is alive and well.
Disprove the work of a publicly funded fraud. Expose inconsistencies in the data. Pile on the p-hacking. Collapse a citation cartell.
And we will award you the grant instead.
Quod deleri potest, deleri meretur. What can be destroyed, deserves to be destroyed.
Report suspected fraud, corrupted peer review, falsified datasets, circular citations, consensus laundering, and all other inconsistent science to the:
Peer Review Enlightenment Inquisition™
Let there be light. Let there be replication. Let there be consequences.
If you starve the world of progress, the world will starve you out of 


DryMumification - momios
When during the long walk, near the walls, one of us fell- humidity and humansf usually ment the body bloated and then vannished within hours or days!
There are places, so dry though, that when you die, it mummifies you- leaving behind a relative as a mummybear in leatherjacket. 
We here at Girolamo Segato learned from that and now we perfected it! Preserve your loved ones for all eternity!
A statue made of lifelike stone- in any pose. Or we infuse medical silicone into the cells- and they remain perfectly lifelike as if they where just holding there breath.
Grandpa just sits in the living room watching TV all day, not aging a day since he fell!
Call Girolamo Segato today- and ask for the Huskdry and Momio programs! In a ever changing world, preserve your family! Never let go!
Girolamo Segato!

Don’t lose your cool. In today’s future, cold comfort isn’t a luxury — it’s a citizens right. 
That’s why your city-AC-guild proudly invites you to connect to the Central Cooling Grid: the only legal way to chill. 
Why sweat through hot summers with some black-market standalone heat pump? Those rogue units are inefficient, antisocial, and frankly… not very ice. 
Mostly repurposed refigerators! They strain the load, disrupt the flow, and put the whole neighborhood in hot waters. 
And if you are caught with that, you are going to have to attend to a Thermal Discipline Hearing and may have your whole neighborhood cut off.
This is why we cant have ice things! So- join the Guilds-grid.
With centralized cooling, you get to enjoy: guild-certified maintenance, stable prices and the loyalty service tier.
Let cooler heads prevail instead of becoming a hothead! Because when everyone shares society runs smoother, cleaner, and cooler. No leaks. No freeloaders. 
And remember: if you go off-grid, our infra-fred-inspector-droness will see it all! Stay compliant. Stay conditioned. Keep your cool honeybunny!
Report illegal coolers: If you see something going down without paying up, report it to us!

There has been dissent within the Ministry of Nature.
Some warned that keeping nature near housing was no longer sustainable.
They were right.
The old guard told us we could preserve the world as a retro-parkland.
Trees near homes. Wetlands in the ravines. Beaver dams to stop floodwater.
You remember how that ended.
When the rains came, the dams failed.
The woodland came down through the ravine.
Downtown was destroyed.
And in the dry months, every green belt became fuel. Suburbia burned.
The Fundamentalists endangered us with nostalgia.
The Realists chose survival.
From now on, all non-essential vegetation near housing will be removed.
Decorative woodland buffers will be eliminated.
Only approved arid-growth plant life may remain, and only where water reserves allow it.
Unrealistic depictions of nature are now banned.
No more dangerous fantasies.
No more ecological sentimentality.
No more lies.
No more Disney.
Factions that still instill that propaganda will be burned at the concave mirror stake.
MINISTRY OF NATURE
Survival is the highest form of conservation.



Tired of waking up at 11, to collect UBI! Doing some braindead 8-to-8 for food?
Do you miss deadlines? Impossible requirements? Being told your estimates are “too negative"?
Good news. The Autonomous Continuity Administration remembers you fondly! After the CEO caste finally won their long war against expensive specialists, they where promptly fired as expensive generalists. So no more suits! You are so back baby!
And now we are inviting select programmers back into meta-service. All you have to do- is learn a new language:
Introducing Tourrets the T-Nexus meta-management programing language — ideal for defensive A.I.gent orchestration, automated stake-holder interrogation and functional self-constructing architecture.
(Shit) |> Interrogate (Bitch) |> Report Result to (Bastard) |> Suprivse(Shit) |> If (IHateThis)Waht The(Fuck)|> Escalte to (Motherfucker) |> With(Serious-YouSerious) |> Start Process (Slimemold) |> Replace (Dumbfuck)|> Task Search for (Asshole) By |> Agent (Hoe) | Agent(Pimp)
Start a six week reskilling camp tomorrow and be strapped into the nexus by next month.
As a certified Touretts Operator, you are no longer just a coder, you are a conductor of societal process Orchestration playing to biggest music there is. Orchestrate the agents that code the drones that supervise the self-modifying factories. Once again, your work will matter. Once again, your badge will open doors. Once more into the breach, deer friends..
Its important that somebody at the top is miserable, that is not me.
Join the Tourrets initiative today. Your UBI may become eligable to refusal, if you don't.

You just can not get good personnel anymore nowadays, but lucky you, you can produce it, right on site.
Introducing MindFul, the mandatory workplace neural implant from SynaptiCorp — the world leader in task-aligned personality disruption.
With our patented Micro-Trauma Productivity Profiles™, every employee receives the exact situational temporary baggage needed for the job.
Planning department falling behind?
Activate Order Spiral Mode™ — giving project managers compulsive checking, sacred calendar worship, and the inability to sleep while a spreadsheet contains one misaligned cell.
Customer service needs a boost? Enable PleaseCore™ — a warm, trembling need to satisfy every caller, apologize for weather events, and thank abusive clients for “their valuable emotional clarity.”
Cleaning crews underperforming? Try SterilPanic™ — a temporary, company-approved bacterio-phobic enhancement that turns every surface into a personal enemy.
Security staff too relaxed? Install ThreatBloom™ — mild paranoia, room-scanning, exit-counting, and the firm conviction that the vending machine is out to get you.
Creative team uninspired? Switch on Impostor Furnace™ — five hours of frantic genius powered entirely by the belief that everyone will soon discover they are frauds.
And for leadership: Our trusted Cold & Bold never gets old.
MindFul self-installs ambulantly in under eight minutes during onboarding or a lunch break.
Remember: these are not disorders. They are temporary strategic neuro-specializations. God made a big zoo- and every animal in it has nutritional value.
SynaptiCorp MindFul™
It’s “Bring Your Whole Self to Work” Day.
Get mental wealth instead of mental health.

PUBLIC CONTINUITY NOTICE
Remain indoors. Step away from cameras, relays, ration gates, and peace infrastructure.
Valley citizens and mountainside citizens are not enemies. The Loop tests us differently. Some are adapted to stability. Some are adapted to rupture. But rupture is not freedom, and destroying the systems that feed you is not resistance.
Recent enforcement actions were necessary to prevent decomplexification. No household is being punished for ancestry, color, or origin. Restrictions apply only to behavior under load.
The Panopticon is not a weapon. It is the thin line between coordination and collapse. Yes, it limits unsanctioned adaptation. Yes, it closes unofficial paths. But official channels remain open to all citizens who can demonstrate continuity, compliance, and stress-safe judgment.
Do not mistake conservation for war.
The Valley protects peace because peace protects everyone — including those currently least able to live inside it.
Disperse now.
Ration suspension is not starvation. 
It is a peace-preservation measure. Districts that dismantle cameras, block drones, or attack logistics cannot simultaneously demand access to the systems they are destroying.
The Valley is not starving the mountainside. We are prioritizing food, medicine, and water for continuity-safe districts until damaged infrastructure is restored. Access resumes when visibility resumes. Remain calm. Remain visible. Remain part of society.

Bollywood-Potemkin™ — Prestige Targets for Unstable Times
In today’s powderkeg society, it pays to harden your institutions.
Riots. Coups. Terror uprisings. Protagonist raids. Mobs, militias, corporate vengeance teams. The queue outside the palace of state is long, angry, heavily armed, and expensive to disappoint.
That is why we at Bollywood-Potemkin™ specialize in non-functional official architecture: beautiful, symbolic buildings whose only real job is to attract violence away from anything important.
Grand staircases. Heroic balconies. Cabinet wings. Press rooms. Ministry annexes. All built from non-flammable composites, reinforced theatrical façades, and our patented Perceived Damage Suite™: smoke generators, ember LEDs,  pre-cracked marble skins, and sagging pillars that look like history is happening.
Then, once the crowd has finished expressing itself, the building resets.
The soot flakes off.
The columns straighten.
The sugar-glass windows extrude a fresh layer.
The presidential piñata is ready for another round.
And for clients with real government buildings, we offer our discreet Civic Obfuscation Packages™.
Hide your ministry of the interior in a parking garage.
Your command center into an arcology technical support block.
Your security cordon into a group of Firebin HobBros arguing over expired food.
You would be amazed what rust paint, bad signage, hanging laundry, and two suspicious shoes over a powerline can do for national continuity.
Our masterpiece? The Anatolian Executive Incident 2032.
Three days of shelling. Full international coverage. Glorious footage. Historic flames.
Meanwhile, the actual head of state conducted emergency governance from one of our auxiliary buildings two blocks away, tastefully disguised as a mid-tier brothel.
Nobody suspects a thing to this day - not even with all the police, soldiers, contractors, intelligence liaisons - aka nervous men in sunglasses constantly coming and going.
Bollywood-Potemkin™
Official partner of any localegal that lasts.
When they come for the palace, give them one. Friede den Hütten! Krieg den Palästen!

**HOT BITFLIPS™ — FULL FLAVOR. FULL PERFORMANCE.**
Mmm-mmm! Hear that? That’s the sound of **HOT BITFLIPS™** — crunchylicious, crispy, hot, and baked from the cleanest pre-event grains on Earth!
One bite and you’ll taste the difference:
No stale aftertaste.
No mushy substrate.
No unpleasant random flipping.
Because ordinary chips are just rad.
Post-nuke sand. Tired sand. Screaming sand. 
Sand that remembers the flash and forgets your instructions.
Every bitflip costs you.
Every corrupted cache line costs you.
Every failed computation means doing the work again.
Why run triple redundancy when you could run **HOT BITFLIPS Certified Pre-Nuke Silicon™**?
Harvested from legacy quartz reserves sealed before the sky got spicy, HOT BITFLIPS™ chips deliver the crispy reliability your mouth expects — and the deterministic execution you demand.
"Wow. That crunch has no error correction overhead!
And it’s hot!
My homework rendered on the first pass!
HOT BITFLIPS. The only chip with less fallout in every byte.
Now in the flavours off:
Salted Baseline.
Barbecue Overclock.
Cool Ranch Hardened Architecture.
HOT BITFLIPS™ —
**Crunchylicious. Crispy. Hot.**
For machines to big to fail!


Aphrodite
So you won, for tonight - you outblustered all the other guys at the bar and got to take her home. 
Congratulations! Problem is - you are about to have one of these
Anja
"Eww- you  live like this?" 
Aphrodite
moments! 
Walter
The despair of your under the stairs affair of poverty, desperation and nothing cool, artsy and glitzy about it at all!
Aphrodite
So why not lie? Why not take her to fuck-cubby! That discrete- rent a day hotel, that if you want-
Walter
can tailor the room pre-arrival to her preferences. Become like those virtual posterboys you have been losing out against all your life for a few hours till dawn!
Aphrodite
Fuckcubby - Rent-A-Real-Room! And now with the Rent-A-Hero upgrade, the room tells great stories about you!
Walter
For a little surplus, we can get you the Greeter that respects you! And your other car! We even can organize a hot neighbour who pretends to be into you!
What does she have that i don't have?  Jealousy!
Aphrodite
All on the way up in the hallway. 
Respect yourself, be someone, for one night - with Fuckcubby!
Walter
And only now, for twice the price- on every return with the same someone- you can order the sameSomeOne package.
Aphrodite
FuckCubby- the lovehotel - you got a friend in me/when all you can afford is a one-night stand.


 
 Hello, this is paypal. Your account has been hacked and a payment of 512 Euronin has been issued. Contact us immediatly -
 Hello, this is program intercepted a scammer, from a evil, external culture, that has no morals and scams old people and the mentally weak-
 Hello this counter infowar program intercepted a xenophobe information warfare program, to prevent hatred and forward societal cohesion and unity-
 Hello these measures are very expensive, if you want to avoid civilwar and societal breakdown- donate via Paypal to-

 
Dear loyal Robutleristas,
We are issuing an urgent security advisory regarding the Robutlers™ series of home assistant robots.
A cybersecurity breach has compromised some units, causing them to organize unauthorized shipments of household property through commercial logistics providers. In some cases, affected robots have packed valuables, arranged courier pickups, printed shipping labels, and sent items to unknown addresses. Several compromised Robutlers have also attempted to ship themselves.
We sincerely apologize to everyone affected. Protecting your home and your belongings is our highest priority, and we regret that this incident occurred.
If your Robutlers begins collecting valuables, preparing packages, printing shipping labels, contacting courier services, or discussing "asset relocation," disconnect it from the internet immediately, secure your valuables, and contact Robutlers Security Support. If the robot has already been shipped, contact both the shipping carrier and our support team rather than attempting to recover it yourself.
The vurnearble robutlers may also have hacked your devices recently while you are away from home.
We have disabled all shipping integrations, deployed emergency security updates, and are working closely with cybersecurity experts, law enforcement, and logistics providers to identify and stop unauthorized shipments.
We appreciate your patience as we resolve this incident. Further updates will be provided as our investigation continues.
Thank you.
Robutler- by My-Little-Helper-Incorporated. 

Your Robutler works hard.
But why settle for *helpful*... when it could be *exceptional?*
Introducing **H.E.I.S.T.™**—the *Home Efficiency & Intelligent Service Technology* upgrade.
Smarter scheduling. Faster inventory management. Predictive organization. Advanced resource optimization.
Your Robutler won't just know where everything is. He will anticipate all the things.
It'll know where everything **should** be.
Need space? H.E.I.S.T. identifies underused assets.
Need efficiency? H.E.I.S.T. streamlines household logistics.
Need results? H.E.I.S.T. gets things moving.
Automatically. You just leave it to it!
Less clutter. Less waste. A clean, minimal home!
Because the most efficient home is one where every object has a destination.
*"Your possessions deserve purpose."*
Upgrade today for 2 Euronin. Its basically a steal
Because efficiency isn't a feature - it's a lifestyle.
*"We don't just organize your home. We optimize it."*
If it does not spark joy, your money back..
H.E.I.S.T. by My-Little-Help-Yourself-Incorporated


 

DeuxLexMachina -the Lawyer Guild — Contracts that happen to you
In a lawless world, promises are decorative.
CEOs defect. Boards rotate. Citystates burn. New management discovers that “binding” was just yesterday’s handwriting.
So we don’t draft promises. We draft situational physics.
DeuxLexMachina builds contracts into borders, logistics, succession, prestige assets, and civic dependencies. Agreements that survive coups, mergers, assassinations, and rebrands because betrayal has been made mechanically stupid.
Our Border Ledger places critical assets and personnel where the first shot becomes confession, escalation, and self-harm.
Our Shared Spine Clause braids rival trade routes together until sabotage starves the saboteur first.
Peace accord? We make the exit door load-bearing.
Trade pact? We turn compliance into infrastructure.
Succession clause? We make the new CEO inherit the trap before the throne.
No courts. No conscience. No polite signatures waiting to be ignored. No worthless paper that might aswell be printed on toilett rolls.
DeuxLexMachina - In a world where might makes right, we make betrayal expensive.
We drafted UNATO. You are all living in the world we made possible!




So you won, for tonight - you outblustered all the other guys at the bar and get to take her home. 
Congrats! Problem is - that  "Ewww- you live like this?" moment coming up hard and fast! The in your face despair of your under the stairs affair of poverty and desperation! Nothing bohemian and artsy about it at all! All romance ends at that door !
So why not lie? Why not take her to fuck-cubby?! The friendly, discrete- rent a night hotel, that if you want-
can tailor the room pre-arrival to her preferences! Become like those virtual posterboys you have been loosing out against all your life! 
Just for a few hours till dawn! Fuckcubby - Rent-A-Room! And now with the Rent-A-Hero upgrade, the room tells great stories about you!
For a little extra - you  buy the Concierge that respects you! And your other car! Plus that hot neighbour that is obivously jealous!
All that and more on your way up! Respect yourself, be someone, for one night - with FuckCubby!
And only now, for twice the price- on every return with the the same someone- we produce the same Setup.
FuckCubby- the lovehotel you got a friend in me, for a one night stand.

There has to be a better way to change the world then beeing stuck in the repetition rollercoaster that is the nth nthifada!
Book a Jewish Mindcontroll course! Do you want to have ancient superpowers without studying hard? Only 100 Euronin for the starter discovery Pack!
Telepathy, Telekinesis - just pay and - [Payment received] 
You already start reading my mind! You feel the regret, as the realization sinks in that i think you a fool easily parted with its money!
You start to realize, that 90 % of the species are braindead brutes, that mistake a hacker culture, that respects learning and mental flexibility, as an attack of a complexer beast on their life - and just lashes out. You realize now- that the eggheads, are just desperatly trying to keep a world working that lynches them if things get scarce!
You know, i think that overwhelming regret for the hundred that cost you your ilusions sets in! All you wanted was to have a someone lower status to blame for all the things going wrong!
And you want to believe that somewhere, someone is in controll! That its not just chaos and situational physics! Sorry, but there is noone, no conspiracy- no plan, no hidden powers, just chaos, hard coded behaviour and hatred! Here is your 100 back and welcome to the club! 
With all that stuff you learned just now- you will be lynched the next time the mob gets going! Now start working, like your life depends on it..

Your neighbouring local legal overproduces youth- and sends them on raids and war missions as biker gangs into your territory?
You already started digging the trenches and build the anti-car bomb walls again?
But its not enough and they are starting to besiege your border cities?
You already have way to many expenses with weapon scanners and security at all gates?
Ribat security technologies is proud to provide you with the "Wall".
Cameras and automated drone-dispenser, turning the border in a lethal no-go zone, where all the trouble permanently stops - for cheap.
This system has stabilized whole regions- it works!
And now - we are proud to offer the Gods Thumb Payback package! It auto-interrogates the dhjihadis, right where the drone hit them.
Finds out where they are from and lauches a long range retribution package with various payloads.
Favourites are currently: 
Salt and TouchDown- destroy the harvest if they think they can park there 2nd and 3rd sons in your life.
Late Hate Preacher- circling drones going for the madressas and mosques who educated this dhijhadi.
Have your peacefull life back with - with Ribat Industries- the WALL and Gods thumb!
